Level 15: MP Cost: 32, Duration: 150 seconds, Defense: +75%, Abnormal Status Resistance: +45%, Elemental Resistance: +45%.
we’re all human why trust us,
"Jeder nach seinen Fähigkeiten, jedem nach seinen Bedürfnissen!"
Welcoming all of Brooklyn’s Homeowners, homebuyers, seniors and teens.
Wasn't feeling it with the rug.
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to be the perfect breeder of abuse for the system as I accept and allow myself to channel and thus perpetuate abuse towards life through my accepted and allowed relationships that exist within and as me that I daily walk with and exist as and participate with, spreading the seed of abuse to grow and flourish and destroy life as what is best for all.
This was a piece written by my elder brother, Zak. He is a student at Columbia International University, majoring in Humanities; he has a deep love for the older writings of humanity, preferably those who have already passed away.
When I got around to checking out the post that caused all the commotion, (The Best Souvenirs Are Free), it was amazing to see a virtual patchwork quilt of gravatars situated under the “Like” button. Thank you to everyone who took the time to give that extra click. It made this whole process that much more meaningful.
If you would hesitate to read this because it seems sensational or unnecessarily gory – trust me, it’s smoothly avoided. It’s as tasteful as possible considering the subject matter, and any potential grimness gets lost for the most part in the eloquent writing voice. He really is that good. I can’t emphasize enough how excellently he’s crafted this book. I would like him to write everything else ever from now on.
Not every exercise is the right one to lose belly fat. People that are desirous of getting rid of a bothersome protruding tummy should plan a proper exercise routine. The question for each person will be which exercises are right for him or her? To get information about which exercises to do when trying to lose fat around the belly one should seek out a medical practitioner or a trainer for such advice.
For my card I decided to create a background using a really lovely embossing fold from Stampin Up! called Elegant Lines. I stamped the ODBD Bleeding Heart image on kraft cardstock using cream ink and then trimmed it out after it was dry. It was then mounted on cream cardstock that was die cut using Spellbinders plain and scalloped circle dies. Some cream double stitched ribbon, a charm from my sweet teamie, Sabrina, and some twine finished off the card. I also finished off the interior of the card using the ODBD single stamp Each Minute. Boy oh boy... when I decided to make a kraft & cream card I didn't think that it was going to be so hard to photograph, but it sure was! Finally got a good picture when I put the card in my kitchen window.
Just a few short months ago, after my daughter was born, I had started a blog where I could bring together my new adventures as a mom raising a bilingual daughter, and my thoughts and experiences as an ESL teacher eager to help my colleagues who might not have easy access to seeing ESL methods and practices at work.
An example of the way in which the dubium relative to n. 22 of Inter Oecumenici might be applied practically is found in the following scenario. The competent territorial authority or a diocesan bishop, "strictly speaking (per se)" could restrict the penitential rite to use of only Form B or Form C since these are the optional texts. That same authority, however, could not disallow use of Form A, the forma typica. The illustration applies similarly to the competent authority’s moderation of the celebrant’s posture at Mass. The competent ecclesiastical authority "strictly speaking (per se)" could restrict the celebrant’s posture to one of the optional postures. Since, a sole option is countenanced and a range of options is non-existent, in fact, the competent authority mentioned in canon 838 § 4 could not place any restrictions. And he certainly could not disallow the typical ad altare posture.
You want to be number one. Take note of your page ranking and who is above you. Go to their websites and see what they are offering or what they have that you don’t. Keep in mind, there’s always room for improvement and there are many strategies you can implement to improve your page ranking. Use Google Keyword Tool and Google Trends to identify keywords. You might also want to use Google Analytics to track and analyze data to see how people are getting to your site and what pages are performing best.
The 3 hour shoot flew by, and after a little tweaking the images were ready to download that evening.
Does the power of paint ever get old? Is there anything a gallon of paint can't fix? Have you changed up any rooms with just paint lately? You can read all the details of the Kitchen Renovation here and here.
Over the weekend I had the opportunity to take part in what my church calls a ministry time. It was intended to bring a little bit of closure to a class I took there (in 2010...yes, they've been a little behind in scheduling these times and no, I didn't mind the wait). The short version is that those assigned to minister to you, spend about 2 hours or so interviewing you-- talking about the peaks and the valleys of your life. Then they spend about another hour or so affirming you, praying for you, praying with you, etc. It's a very healing and heart-warming time (at least for me it was).
8. Pour into lined baking dish. Give it a shake to even out the mixture.
BOURNEMOUTH SYMPHONY ORCHESTRA
This is the same as asking, Who is the God mentioned in Gen 1:1? Or, Who is speaking in Gen. 1:26?
time will tell, how far we'll go
Because on the basis of last night, they are. United failed in so many ways last night, not least of all team selection. Ji-Sung Park’s inclusion in big clashes isn’t irregular, but the South Korean’s impact was significantly blunted by his lack of match sharpness. Antonio Valencia was restricted to a ten minute cameo as the game was slipping away, a truly baffling decision considering how much of United’s attacking play has been reliant on the Ecuadorian of late. As such, United’s biggest talisman was left up front, alone and unable to provide any sort of spark. Wayne Rooney has had to grow accustomed to his manager’s insistence on adopting a 4-5-1 formation in the season’s biggest matches, and whilst his frustration didn’t truly boil over, his performance was almost futile considering just how rarely United managed to get the ball to him in a dangerous position. As reliable as Paul Scholes has been since his surprise return in January, both he and Ryan Giggs had disappointingly ineffectual evenings, and, even more worryingly, no one stepped up in their stead. It’s been noted enough times this season that Ferguson is currently in charge of a team that isn’t always capable of rising to the occasion, but last night’s performance, in a local derby no less, must act as a numbing and humbling notice to the club that when things do go wrong, a Plan B simply isn’t there, especially if Rooney is left this isolated and unsupported.
I applauded President Mugabe’s bold move to state the obvious, that his party is guilty of perpetrating violence. However I believe that more can be done. Yes he admitted it, but that was the first step. There is need to take a second step, to make amends to all those who were harmed. This is so that Zimbabwe as a whole can move on.
The sky was that distinctive springtime blue romanticized on the ceilings of countless Southern porches. I fired up the V-twin engine and let her warm. Then after swinging my legs and beer belly over the saddle, I raced down the driveway and made the left turn left towards Opelousas.
Drake has done his best to share this information. However, I want to be clear that no one knows precisely when this is going to happen.
Do I think you need all of the colours? Definitely not. These are not even really everyday products for me, as they require a bit more time and effort than just swishing on some eye-liner. However, when I want a dramatic eye, or I want to add dimension to an otherwise flat eyeshadow look these are a huge must-have. My top pics would be 'Vegas', 'Element', (obvi) 'Go Violet', 'Bronze Millionaire' and 'Mermaid'. They are each fairly unique colours and oh so gorgeous on the eyes.
In the mid 2000s National Foods faced an angry public when they started marketing the Pura milk brand in WA. West Australians thought they were to be overrun by milk from Eastern States cows. The Parliament discussed what percentage of Eastern States milk was packaged in WA.
This filled me up before I had even finished it and kept me full until lunch time. I could drink this every morning and be a happy girl.
They followed the plan perfectly...
for Christians to die it is our gain
I can't wait to see what tomorrow will bring.
130 10. Book Review: George Seferis, A Poet’s Journal: Days of 1945-1951 (Cambridge, 1974). Chicago Sun-Times/Showcase, September 1, 1974, p. 15.
Luckily for me, my journey was not over. It took two other mentors to help me find a deeper and more honest view of the truths of those years. The first one was a Sociology professor named Lonn Lanza-Kaduce. He issued a challenge at the beginning of his Sociology of Law course. He said that anyone can read a theory and tear it apart and find all of its weak points; deconstruction is easy. What is hard, he said, and more rewarding, is to give each author their strongest possible reading. What problems or issues is the author most concerned with? What truth or truths are they trying to deal with? As a reader, can you give the author the benefit of the doubt and confront him on his strongest ground, instead of searching for his weaknesses. It was a serious challenge and it had a profound impact on the tenor of the class, every week we had serious discussions about the merits and strengths of different theories and we looked at how different theories actually addressed different domains of problems, and how much of the criticism that was written about them was really missing the point. We learned how to build better theories.
‘Yea, I’m not working – just writing,’ I said – without looking up.
Hatch Egg Faster
Juan Moreno Maya "El Pele"/Cantaor
A Hackney Council spokesperson said: “We understand that moving can be stressful and we are supporting Ms Parma through her move to a more suitable home.
In a nutshell that is how I would update the bathroom as it sits today and the total cost would be under $150.00... and you would have some nice new plush bath towels! Love that part :)
but then.. bye bye money.
1 1/2 lbs ground chicken
SPOTS
Tomorrow we will be heading to our friend's apartment for dinner, this will be a quiet, but fun NYE!
We are so fortunate to be born as human, Human body is so precious.
We need to STOP BULLYING!!! Do your part!
.the fear
In (Part 1) of this blog, we talked about the experience you receive when you go to a restaurant for lunch.
One of the biggest complaints I have seen, is that meatloaf is dry. If you bake it until it is no longer pink, you are actually overcooking your meatloaf. There is an enzyme in onions that causes meat to stay pink, even when it is fully cooked. After it is exposed to the air, it will gradually become more brown. Did you know that? Cooking your onions first reduces this effect a little, as well as provides more flavor to the meatloaf. But use a thermometer to check if your meatloaf is done. Trust your thermometer!
..populations
music. . . Good Golly Miss Molly, Little Richard
So, to help me prepare, I'm conducting a little poll and I'd very much appreciate your input.
I recently stumbled upon an up and coming artist by the name of Jasmine Becket-Griffith aka Strangeling. You know of her? Choosing my favorite pieces of her work was both surprising and simple. Surprising because I rarely enjoy such a quantity of one’s art. Simple because I felt instantly connected to her characters. Her work is all female (I do not believe she has any male works), and consists of the impression fantastical realism – which I undoubtedly relate to.
she'd survive..........
An Engaged Couple Viewing Constable’s 'The White Horse'
3) Heat up 1 table spoon of vegetable oil in wok
- Breast pump. My milk took almost a week to come in. Apparently, somewhere my biological clock missed the "make milk" memo. We had to feed Little Monkey something so he had formula the first few days because I had nothing to give. That little delay in milk production caused so many problems with breastfeeding. I wish I had just pumped the whole time. Usually, you can rent pumps from the hospital, but they didn't have any available. This time, I will be taking my pump... just in case.
The writing is exquisite and the changing shape of the landscape, the weather and Harold's changing state of mind is compelling. This novel has not receive much media attention and had it not been for Jane's recommendation I would never have heard of it. And I'm so glad she did. It is both tragic and funny, a revelation and deceptively clever in its simplicity. Rachel Joyce, who has been writing under the radar for many years, is simply brilliant.
What prompted the creation of these types of establishments? Was it simply an attempt to offer cheaper booze and undercut the competition?
I love the rose print hanging on the wall. I was so glad to be able to find these roses to match the print. The vase they are in came from a yard sale. The candlesticks I was going to paint them today, but decided I liked them just as they were. I cleaned them up with some polish and placed the little birdies on top. They were a dollar for the pair at the yard sale.
It's a phrase people use a lot. Life is not fair. And it's true. Nature doesn't do fair. Terrible diseases can dramatically reduce the chances for some people to enjoy life, and cause people to die young and tragically. Hurricanes and tsunamis and tornadoes strike with unforgiving intensity. Some people get much more than a fair share of nature's wrath, while others seem to skip through life unaffected.
If that was true, I was really glad I hadn’t tensed up. She was sturdily built and she didn’t hold back in the slightest. She kicked down the dog gate, and an instant later, her fist connected with my cheekbone to send me sprawling to the ground, my tailbone absorbing most of the impact. I’d been knocked around by Lung, Glory Girl, Bakuda and even Leviathan. Some of those guys hit magnitudes harder than Bitch did, but it still hurt like hell.
Dear Henry S. Gao:
Force between two current carrying conductors - Lorentz force equation. – Definition of magnetic flux density B. Hall effect and semiconductors, The Biot-Savart Law and Amperes law. Application of these laws in calculation of B. Need for Magnetic Vector potential and Magnetic scalar potential in magnetostatics - B due to a finite and infinite wire carrying a current I – B on the axis of a circular and rectangular loop carrying a current I – Magnetic Flux. Current carrying loop in the magnetic field - Torque on a loop carrying a current I – Definition of magnetic moment. Ohm's law – Equation of continuity. Inductance of solenoids. Energy contained in magnetic fields – Magnetic materials - boundary conditions.
Getting back to our text for the day, Acts 27:12, “The more part advised to depart thence.” That sounds quite democratic. The majority ruled but was the majority right?
Evan came over and stood beside me. Tears started to well up in his eyes as he said "YES! I want to be just like Kyle!"
The formula is a little sheer, but very glowy and natural. It’s also easily buildable and layer so the sheerness is not a problem. It glides on like a second skin and you don’t feel it at all but you get such a radiant rosy glow without looking like you’re obviously wearing blush.
That’s a big reason I’ve found 4HB such a great program: total avoidance plus a day when moderation is a bad word? THAT I can live with.
(root_nsu1c308)@/etc # more vfstab.prevm
Several months earlier, six members of another family had been shot and killed as they slept in the house.
Dae:energetic man! because I am always smiling every day.
Am Yisroel Chai.
That slide show had several pictures of Nick Swisher's wife, actress Joanna Garcia -- she's adorable (and so is he):
- US States
“dropping the new science and kicking the new knowledge” and for being
Yep, seems like it’s time to actually tell you about the trip.
Our days used to be determined by weather, previous engagements and where does Pup want to go today?
The economists now expect the country’s inflation to average 5.29% this year, down slightly from their forecast of 5.3% a week earlier, according to the survey. Despite the reduction, the forecast is above the central bank’s inflation target of 4.5% for the year.
a circular vision to read and re-read
“Wait,” said a flabbergasted I, “does killing him affect his becoming President?”
It seems to be accepted wisdom these days that it takes 10 calories of fossil fuel to produce 1 calorie of food. I won't dispute that only because it is meant as a North American average and, as such, it may motivate some people to grow their own food or to buy food locally. But the number itself is subject to all sorts of assumptions such as regional and seasonal variation. I highly doubt an organic farmer in California consumes 10 calories of fuel for every calorie she consumes. If she were, then the weather observer stationed in Yellowknife would probably be consuming 1000.
For many Americans, the recession began well before 2007, and it’s far from over. It’s become a lost decade of fading opportunity for workers, longer and more frequent bouts of joblessness and declining family incomes.
We got our gardens started this week. I love gardening! My dad plowed the field over at his house and a friend and I planted all the seeds and plants for him. I'm not sure if I can remember everything we planted for him or not, but here's the list...
www.carameredith.com
The doctor is ordering us to quit pretending. Be the real you. Stop masquerading about as though everything is perfect, including yourself. I love this advice, but I have to say that I also see a flashing red light when I read it. It's a warning that comes from James 1:26,
The other friend I haven’t known very long but lived with for a short time before we moved to Texas this past summer. I don’t know if her mom was going through this then or this is something new. But like I said, either way it doesn’t matter and it sucks!
After last week’s shocker almost-elimination of the season’s best vocalist and my favorite, Jessica Sanchez, it was clear tonight that all bets are off. Practically all the contestants stepped up their game or stepped out of their boxes. Luckily only one of them stepped in “it”, but it’s clear he ain’t goin’ home anytime soon. (More on Colton later…) So, it’s time to count down this week’s double dose of American Idol performances as the singers took on # 1 hits from the last decade and “Soul Classics”. Let’s see who did what and who just might hang on another week…
If you do, I promise you, you will never be the same again.
For four days, four magic, memorable days, I lived life in a way never before
“I’m not too good with apologies. That’s why I use this big hammer. If you make a mistake with something like this, you usually don’t have anything left to be sorry for.”
Will scowled, holding his broken finger and tapping it on his chin. "Don't be ridiculous. It's the only way I can recover. Gold's not the only thing that needs qi."
I had a handful of gallstone attacks a few years ago. They came painfully and unpredictably, but disappeared withing 20 minutes to an hour. When this one came on, I was pretty sure what it was and waited, maybe too patiently, for the pain to go away.
Then, we wish a Merry Little Christmas, and a Happy New Year to all.
I have slowed down with Al-Anon a bit but I don't plan on stopping altogether. I hope to at least get to a meeting once a month. I don't read my books that often now but I do believe I live it. I hope so. I was having a bit of trouble with separating from someone that wasn't good for me. I found that I would sometimes misinterpret the be kind, accept people for who they are, kind of Al-Anon type teaching and let myself be mistreated. My misinterpretation I am sure. My girlfriend had the same problem and felt she should stay with her husband when she really shouldn't. She would get pretty confused after reading Courage To Change.
Well, except that she didn't want to participate. But I'm a mean Mama, and I made her go to the first practice.
I hope you all had a very
I'm so sorry that I haven't been able to post anything or reply to any messages, but hopefully it will be fixed soon. I hope all of you have a great week!
the wind of banners
In Ballinspittle
When Sydney Parkinson painted the picture above, the Queen of Tahiti, as far as the crew of the Endeavour who sailed there in 1769 understood, was a woman by the name of Purea or ‘Oberea’, as the British called her.
? 12″ baffled box construction.
17:00 Electronica Reykjavík
Many great adventures start with a kiss!.. These two lovers leave the group during a cave tour and go explore some crevasses and stalagmites on their own!
It is über-helpful with Newton’s 3rd Law (N3L) because finding the name of the pair force means using the same phrase with only the objects flipped.
There’s real documentable positive impact in places that already allow for it. Any church that sanctifies same-sex relationships is seeing somewhat of an economic boom if not from membership increases, then at least from gay couples who want to be recognized by a faith-based community. And any tourist destination that markets itself as gay-friendly is also reaping the rewards of their marketing campaign, even if it’s just for the purposes of a honeymoon.
I’ll do another post on the DIY linen bulletin board, the “art”. and the items on the shelves later. Just want to add though that the “donuts” are actually a tea towel by Avril Loreti that I framed.
The raw shellac which contains lac bug parts and bark shavings is scraped off of the trees. It is then processed for industrial use by placing it into canvas tubes and heating it over an open flame. After the Shellac has liquefied the bug parts and bark seep out of the canvas leaving thick and sticky Shellac which is then dried into a thin sheet and broken up into flakes. It is now ready to be bagged and sold. The end-user uses denatured alcohol to dissolve the broken pieces and make liquid shellac.
Copy obtained: bought, hb
Whilst going through my stock, preparing for tomorrow's I heart Market, I realised I have a lot of pendants. They come in many different shapes, sizes and glaze colours!
Well here I am... some 12 hours after the Superbowl and I am feeling down and lonely. How did I manage to ruin everything I have worked for in the past 3 weeks in one night? I'll tell you how... cheese, cheese, cheese, chips and beer. Though I am excited that the Saints WON THE SUPERBOWL! I can't get over the insane amount of food that I annihilated last night. I didn't even eat the food, I killed it. There was no saving grace for this comida last night, let me tell you. Last night I found myself hoarding and hiding copious amounts of cheese dip and Frito's scoops in my belly. It was as if I had to get rid of all of the food before anyone else could eat it. It was like I believed that the Saint's would not win until I ate all food in sight. Who knows what would have happened had I not eaten all night long! The fate of the Superbowl was in my belly!
It means we can one day live in heaven forever:
By that, I mean that certain something that shines through the plot, the characters, the description and every other part of your story and comes to rest upon the reader in a pleasing way.
"I put it down and I felt it was still heavy. So I backwashed it and all this debris went into my mouth," says the 19 year old. "Then I looked in the can and I saw the tip of the tail and I vomited everywhere."
This is the beginning of self-destruct.
I realize a lot of my stress is from my disorganization and time management. My work world has been much better since I moved into my new office upstairs. The funny thing is there is still 75% of it downstairs in my old space. I realize most of it is unnecessary crap I don't use, so yes I can get rid of things. I need to now figure out how to do that with every other room in my house. I need to actually figure out how to make those room work better, not just look pretty. Less is more.
This is a simple cake made with cake flour, sour cream and butter. The recipe calls for 1/2 teaspoon of cinnamon, but I added 3/4 teaspoon. See, I am a rebel in the kitchen. :)
Among Afrikaner farmers it is more than 300 per 100 000 per year!
As I’d suspected MORE THAN A MONTH AGO, we’re looking at a coverup at the Conservative Party headquarters. March 6th was five days after I’d already explained to some political parties how Elections Canada investigators could quickly get to the bottom of the RoboCon election fraud by reviewing audit logs in CIMS. Instead, I had to figuratively tear my hair out while I read stories of Conservative-friendly call centres “reviewing” tapes of calls to assist investigators, and statements by the CPC that EC had not yet asked for backup tapes for CIMS circa May 2, 2011.
don't get me wrong. i don't excuse myself from living a healthy life. i need to eat healthy and exercise more than ever before. and not for my appearance, but for my level of energy and strength to raise a son. so embracing is different than excusing. and i think that is where lots of women get hung up after a baby... the ones who slowly let themselves go. i hope i won't embrace so much that it becomes laziness. i could see that happening so easily with me.
06 What Is Love
There is absolutly nothing left to the imagination any more. That’s my story and I’m sticking too it!
As we have seen in the last week from the outcry following the release of a couple of YouTube videos in which someone with a camera did nothing more than walk through a couple of London boroughs filming what they saw, racism can be no more than revealing the truth.
We are still only up to 1963 – this went on to the present.
it’s always ourselves we find in the sea
The other story is of the final lighthouse operator and his family. One night, a handful of snakes enter through a window and attack the man, his wife, and their three children. In a desperate gambit to escape, they flee towards their boat, but they are bitten by snakes on branches overhead.
at the beach for Mother's Day * old dining chairs get a makeover with a Target curtain panel * caterpillar on the mailbox post * Kathleen Kelly was right #friendliestflower
Prof Tan Eng Chye
I will not enumerate the different technological advancement that are directly or indirectly linked to space exploration. There are just too many and the point here is to realise that we should be ready to push our boundaries further, work through our political, social and economic differences and invest in the pursuit of knowledge. Science for the sake of science is reason enough to be involved in such endeavours. Justifying those missions are far easier than having to justify spending 66 billions dollars on military.
“Are you allowed to bring her on the bus?” I ask this because I’m thinking, if she’s not allowed to, I will drive to them because I am the one who asked for her help today.
A moment of life springs forth...a young mother carrying her firstborn child.
He was the someone of someone I knew........
Wisdom:
Cooking the Zongzi: Using a large pot (14 quarts or larger), place zongzi into boiling water. This recipe will cook in about 1 hour because the rice was precooked. In other recipes in which the rice was not precooked, Zongzi may require 2 hours of boiling. They are done when they appear rounded and puffy, and are soft to the touch. Serve with soy sauce or soy paste and spicy cock sauce. Do not eat the bamboo leaves.
At this point one of the cameraman was like, YEAH! THAT FOUNTAIN!
I had Home Depot cut down the board for me, so it was just the right size for Alex and Joanna's queen bed. The holes on pegboard are 1" apart. You do have to do a little math and mapping out to figure out your button placements, but once you have the formula down, it's just a matter of counting it out and marking the holes with chalk.
a lot of awesome asses kick ass
I'm sick to death of signs, ballots, instructions on the telephone, etc being in Spanish. I'm tired of voting ballots having Spanish on them. Only citizens of this country can vote (exception being Chicago, of course) and a requirement for citizenship is the ability to read, write and speak passable English. So if you can't read the ballot, tough shit. Don't vote.
So I'm getting back into the swing of things after having the baby. I'm actually all booked out until the end of the year (mostly because I'm cutting back so I don't totally loose it!) and will be posting some sessions I've done recently. Life is already getting back to normal and busy, busy!
Oh dear I see that Nanny recently started having a moan again about how much we all drink, this time targeting the "professional households" which allow their children to have a drink before they become teenagers.
It's six days later, and we are still watching and waiting. We have crystals now (yay!), and if we wanted to, we could yank out those strings and enjoy some delicious rock candy right this very minute. We could! But, see... if we wait a bit longer, the crystals will have more of a chance to form, and the candy will be bigger.
With the rise of American brewing ingenuity, barley wine has taken on new heights with a much stronger hop addition than its English counterpart. Adding more hops during the boil of brewing lends more bitterness and aroma when fresh and a deeper tropical fruit character when aged; I prefer most American barley wine fresh. Richly aged barley wines are a perfect accompaniment for Stilton blue cheese, while fresh, hoppy barely wines can compliment with the sharpness of a farmhouse Cheddar. Beer and cheese is simply the better pairing – forget about wine, unless it’s a barley wine.
Warning: Wicked fantasies anyone? Up for some sex in public, sex with a stranger, sex in an office, sex in a bar, sex with a Dom, and bondage sex? Good. Strap in and hang on.
And I believe in one holy catholic and apostolic Church. I acknowledge one baptism for the remission of sins; and I look for the resurrection of the dead, and the life of the world to come. Amen.
The 1930s musicals of Fred Astaire and Ginger Rogers will always hold a special place in my heart. Believe it or not, before our hyper-sensitive and more sexually aware era, it was perfectly acceptable for a straight man to love musicals without his "manliness" being called into question. I'm pretty sure your grandfather could hum a few Irving Berlin tunes in his day, but just try walking down the street belting out an Andre Lloyd Webber song--yeah, whole different scenario.
Bay Street Emeryville – Emeryville, CA
I am loving the fishtail banner look right now & just freeformed these using both sides of the designer paper I already had cut.
I also try to include links to the author’s site for more info, series descriptions and excerpts.
While you're preheating your pizza stone, it's time to get your pizza dough ready by dividing the dough ball evenly to make 2 pizzas (just visually divide it or if you really want to get technical you can always use a kitchen scale)
Train table ala appetaizer table brings treats before and after dinner. Everyone had a chance to cozy up by the tree and chat. Perfect way to start the evening! Oh, and did I mention the crab dip...OMG.
Formed in 1982, the ABORTION SQUAD was assembled from the remnants of two high school punk bands, The BY-PRODUX, and The FIZZICAL FITS.
Judge # 2 -- Exciting BBQ flavor, needs more peppers to be taken seriously.
-singapore cane to the back of Y2J!
Not happy: Modern Family star Eric Stonestreet made a joke about producers allowing Chris Brown to be there
Well after a week of the flu and a week of Spring Break, we were very excited to get back to our lives on Saturday with a St Paddy's Day Big Apple Pittie Pack Walk.
After retelling the story, it was time to make our own caterpillar! Just follow these simple steps:
Wednesday I tried to convince my 5 year old to let me make him a quilt (it was his birthday on Friday, so I thought a late birthday quilt would be nice). Complete lack of interest. Which is weird, since he love snuggling under the other quilts in the house. Then Mr. 7 decided he would like a quilt, and the fun began. I've had a giant chevron quilt planned in my head for months, so I drew a sketch for Finn he loved it. He helped me design it, picked out fabrics and is really excited about it. I got it all cut on Thursday and sewed all the HST blocks together on Friday night. And then lost all motivation.
That great act of friendship inspired me. I have been wanting to do a giveaway here On My Plate f.o.r.e.v.e.r., but haven't been organized enough to get it done. I have decided to add my own $50 Pampered Chef Gift Certificate. This one will be available to "friends" on Facebook.
At first glance the book seems very ‘pink’ but actually tackles some serious issues. Ultimately the book is uplifting and positive but how important do you think it is for children to read books that deal with difficult situations, such as single parent families, broken homes and crime? Do you think it helps the younger reader know that they may not be alone, perhaps even empowers them in living their own lives?
and headaches that kill
For any who don't know about printing onto muslin this is how you do it. Iron butcher paper, the wax side down, onto your fabric, I used muslin. Cut the size of your printer paper and then feed through the printer. My ink is not waterproof so I coffee stained the fabric and then ironed on the butcher paper.
Angina occurs more frequently in women than in men, and more often in African-Americans and Hispanics than in Caucasians. It also occurs more frequently as people age 25% of women over the age of 85 and 27% of men between 80 and 84 years of age have angina.
Dylan Neal as Dan Dryer
Nicola
–Glutino Gluten-Free Pretzel Twists (one of my favorite snacks to keep on hand)
I've colored with Spectrum Noirs and TH Distress Inks and the bow I have added sparkle to with Stampin' Up's Dazzling Diamonds (so love that stuff!). I printed the image a few times so I could make parts of the bell really pop out as well, and I added some of Ben's new bells too. The pins are also from the new Ben stash so I covered all the bases with what he brought :))
Everyone’s work is different. But for me the journey develops not from pre-determined pieces, but from creating the puzzle as I go along. I don’t know what the finished pictures is supposed to look like. I discover it as I work.
In the morning the conference has indeed shrunk again. They decide to combine the two parallel sessions into one because some of the speakers have not bothered to show up. We start off with just 37 people, going up to 48 with some very late arrivals, but that's it. I had thought to blow off the morning too, but it's just too depressing to give a talk to an empty room so out of pity for the speakers I stayed.
And the desserts here are to die for. First of all, kudos to the pastry chef for creating such a beautiful dessert. I have to say this is the first time I have eaten such an elaborate one in KL (last time I had something like this was in a Michelin restaurant in UK) and it was sooooooo delicious as well.
The hurricane outlook includes 3 hits in Gulf platform areas with at least 2 making a US landfall.
So, I'm not sure how many people still read this blog. I didn't post much for a long time. I'm hoping, though, maybe I'm still in people's GR feed.
When you set goals be mindful of your state of mind. Many people set goals at the beginning of a new year and call them resolutions. Many have broken resolutions by the next week. It becomes a habit, I had a relative whose New Years resolution every year was to quit smoking. If you have a habit of breaking the resolutions then that’s not the right frame. Any time of year is a good time to set goals. I think my birthday is a good landmark and my son pointed that out to me very well. He will be 8 next month and on my birthday this year he made me a card that said “Happy Birthday and Happy New Year!”, advancing in a new year of you life is a great time to reflect and look to the future. Special days of the year are great for reflection and re-evaluation.
4/ I was present at the penultimate Joy Division gig at Derby's Ajanta. All too soon, poor Ian was gone.
So lets move on to my second point. Annoying people.
3. Armor sets – opinion?
Had a little time...
The architecture in this town is quite romantic. Even the name "Sintra" is romantic sounding. I think I could wander the streets for hours, without destination, and be happy with just the atmosphere.
It says nothing about the plot. 'So how could it win?' I asked myself. Then came the lightbulb.
The music that we know as the blues sprang up in the southern U.S., tho no one knows exactly where or when. What we do know is that there were blues “centers”—places around which the music seemed to be particularly concentrated & which each had—to some extent at least—regional characteristics in terms of the particular blues “sound.” There was a sound associated with Atlanta & the east coast, & certainly a sound associated with Mississippi, as well as with Memphis & New Orleans, tho those cities also figured in other associated types of music as well—jazz, certainly, but also string band & jug band music. Later, blues became centered in Chicago as blacks migrated out of the south—in many ways, the Chicago blues sound post World War II was an extension of the Mississippi sound, thanks to the Illinois Central Railroad & such Mississippi stalwarts as Howlin’ Wolf, Sonny Boy Williamson I, & Muddy Waters all moving there.
♥ Could be fairly predator proof, or at least slow them down.
Lewin argued that human behavior is a product of both the situation and past experience. Given this theoretical perspective, the right question is not a question of Genes v. Environment, the right question is how do genes and environment interact to shape behavior?
OP8: Slush (L.G. and Giant Sand- 1997)
Then you learn how to apply this to living forms. As people move from place to place and perform actions, their bodies, limbs, even their clothes and hair (and everything else) are affected by the forces exerted by the muscles working against gravity, wind and air resistance, and this is expressed by drawing the forms squashed down or stretched out. Also, bodies can squash or stretch if they're affected by external forces out of their control (like a person tripping and falling face first on the sidewalk...their face might very well squash into the hard pavement).
But, then, this shot cuts to a more objective angle directed from another corner of the room a good distance away from the suspicious workers at the insurance company. At the end of the shot, Manny looks in the teller's direction somewhat innocently.
Heard only the wind rustling the dry corn stalks.
Today’s Question: Four cities have hosted the Olympic Games more than once. What are the four?
On the other hand, I don't want to lose the period in my growth that this blog was always intended to chronicle, and so I've decided that the best thing to do is keep this blog for as long as Blogger/Google maintains the space, but develop a new website for most of my future online interaction.
Maybe I have viewed one too many James Bond films, but I have always had a love affair with with an Aston Martin (and throw in Audi, Mercedes and Jag too while you are at it). One of the first films I recall seeing as a child was Goldfinger and images of the sleek, racy and chic James Bond car of choice have stayed with me to this day.
We hope everyone has a fun safe father's day!!!
-been on vacations together (mountains, beach, here...there)
I've watched too many Sherlock Holmes episodes in the past few days and I'm on Jeremy Brett overload.
U. S. Congress, OTA (Office of Technology Assessment). (February, 1991). Complex Cleanup: The environmental legacy of nuclear weapons production. OTA-O-484. U.S. Government Printing Office, Washington, D.C.
More to the point, Rais’s remark reflects a warped and distorted view about how a professional news outfit would treat the integrity of news and the integrity of information.
The second quake, also measuring 4.2 on the Richter scale, struck at 12.31pm and was felt on the west coast of the South Island.
Start living a life without conscience; forget every sweet thing that ever gets spoken to some gullible drifting head.
“A teenage taste of beer aside, Mitt Romney does not consume alcohol, which begs the question — will total abstention put his candidacy, perhaps even this great nation, in jeopardy?”
Maynooth had the largest number of college applications for 2012 which is a vote of approval for a management team, who, when faced with adversity used the opportunity to instigate change and became all the stronger for doing so.
A heap of broken images, where the sun beats,
So, here I was, just mesmerized by this girl who seemed to be pulling off these OTK boots perfectly. I studied the boots...there was a zipper in the inner calf, but it didn't go all the way up. There was a gap in the OTK part, but with a buckle. I went super Encyclopedia Brown on her ass.
Closing Thoughts
In this post we will look at the different types of development that the URA plans for and in particular we will focus on industrial developments as interest from investors has been increasing in this segment.
Rules and Restrictions (AKA the fine print):
…I want to talk about an issue that Missouri has already addressed in a variety of ways – the issue of illegal immigration. I’m sure you’ve seen the headlines about Arizona’s new law aimed at dealing with those who enter our country illegally. It has been called the strictest immigration law in generations. While Missouri hasn’t gone to the same lengths as Arizona, our state has made significant policy changes that effectively deal with illegal immigrants who enter our state. Because of those changes, Missouri is ahead of the game when compared to many other states that are now dealing with this issue.
At this point we can remove the safety levers, and to do so you need only pull up on the small exposed spring in the sear assembly, while wiggling out your safety levers. I started with the safety lever on the left side.
After lunch, we were ready to explore, arriving at the cathedral at around 3:15. Winter hours. Closed at 3pm. Grrr. On to the museum next door. Closed Mondays. Next museum, closed. At that point we gave up on the idea of indoor exploration and started down the street for a walking tour of Palma. To be continued…
Bennett, after realizing I was ironing, "Mommy, why are you ironing?! Girls aren't supposed to iron!"
The feel of her little fingers grasping for his fly and slipping inside to get a better grip of his stiff cock took his breath away and he almost spoilt it all there and then at the feel of her soft hand taking him firmly in hand. But he couldn’t mess up now this had turned into something he would never have expected and he was going to make sure that it didn’t end until lunchtime was over.
The numbers support this customer-focused strategy. On any given day, 75% of purchases, on Zappos.com, are from returning customers. Repeat customers order more than 2.5 times per year and have a higher average order size vs. first-time customers (source: Luxury Daily, July 2011).
From: EllisTyd
Hoegaarden Wit - 1 pm Bagpipe's
"Jeez you're looking pretty salty, better head in for a shower," I tell him. At which point he explains that he and his friend were on a quest to save freshwater for the trip. So they did not shower once. With pride clearly welling in his voice he told us how he and his friend were congratulated for saving water at their final lunch.
Sunday, early afternoon, we were able to check into the Disney Boardwalk Resort with Stampin' Up! After checking in we went exploring the Boardwalk and then the kids were itching to get into the pool. As you can see Jordan found her pen pal, Alexis Van Diepen, at the pool. While the kids were in the pool I headed to the Hospitality Desk to spin the wheel for the first time. We got a very nice MDS Journal and Stampin' Up! made the kids these awesome MDS Swatch Books in their own carrying case so they can get character autographs at Disney. How sweet are they!!!??!!! I will show you pictures of all these awesome gifts in another post.
And yes, six dishes for three was probably one dish too many, but even then our dinner costs us less than $25 each. Bring on more interesting pub menus, I say, and we'll carry on eating.
Granny is 88 and still lives by herself. She is pictured here with her great granddaughter (my daughter)
Both.
Word on the street is that this is still popular.
But that is not the end of the story. If it were, all would be hopeless. Just when my daughter caught up and walked by without knowing I was there, I called to her, and she turned her head and found me there. The Lord of Creation calls to each one of us. For those who hear His voice, obey and turn to Him, He gives the right to become children of God.
I used the scallop circle die with the Manhattan flower embossing folder and also the vintage vogue stamp set for the rose.
which are related to our cultural identities and more importantly, how
_____If there is one thing I'm good at it's not being able to discover my talents
Now, Joy will leave everything behind to find the one who has offered his help, a homeless boy called Creed. She will become someone else. She will learn to survive. She will breathe…if only she can get to Creed before it’s too late.
You're wondering "Did she turn to bank robbery in order to fund that ridiculous addiction to shoes and chocolate?"
1 cup finely chopped onions
This site is large and comprised of two main mounds. Around these mounds are, as stated above in Tip #013, piles of rocks.
Earlier in an interview, Pooja defended the bold tone of the film and said, “There is no reason why any actress under the sun should be apprehensive about a sequel to Jism or design as a path breaking as this. They would be in the best hands, creatively and aesthetically.”
Completing quests for different factions increases your Reputation with that faction. As your reputation increases, you gain ranks and receive bonuses when dealing with that faction.
But, I gave her the "answer of the hour" which was,
A word about the Sharing. Horrible. That’s the word I’m looking for. It hurt, a lot. Afterwards they were always confined to bed with dreadful headaches and phantom pains in their limbs. Disoriented and afraid.
A spokesman for SAH said it would initially operate under the BMI Regional banner but that further plans were yet to be announced. He said there were no plans for any job cuts.
“Too fast! Too Fast! We're going to hit it!” Scrunge shut his eyes and braced himself against the bulkhead of the shuttle.
Of the 38 bellweather stocks that I follow guess which ones have the highest P/E ratios? BIDU, AMZN, MCD and KO. Okay, I understand why BIDU is trading at 29x projected EPS estimates for FY2012 as they are growing at a very nice clip. AMZN? Don’t get me started on that one. It is trading at about 177x projected EPS for FY2012 and over 60x projected EPS for FY2012. I don’t get it and I never will. Now come the surprises. McDonalds is currently trading at 17x FY2012 EPS estimates and Coke is trading at 19x FY2012 EPS estimates. They are both only growing earnings at 10% annually and pay dividends of less than 3%. Go figure. On the other hand, companies growing much faster such as AAPL and GOOG are much cheaper. AAPL is trading at less than 13x the consensus estimates for their FY ending on 9/30/2012 and GOOG is currently trading at only 14x their FY2012 estimates. This makes no sense to me at all. I can understand why people may be a bit skeptical of AAPL’s ability to continue their torrid growth rates considering that 51% of all American households now have at least one AAPL product under their roof but for the life of me I can’t figure out why mature companies like KO and MCD are trading at P/E’s of 17-19.
I think this is a most lovely time of year, when we remember to look in the faces of the ones we love, and share in their delight, when we make memories that become suffused with love and tenderness as the years go by.
Neurotypical talent 5.1 Average
I am not saying that the paleo community has caused my disordered eating. On the contrary, I have had patterns of disordered eating for a long time — as long as I can remember. Paleo has made me aware of it and has given me tools to overcome it (though I am not there yet). But these images, this ideal that I somehow had subsumed, is making me feel bad all the time, and that stress and that emotional distress, makes that animal in me that much harder to tame.
You held a knife to my throat and laugh
8. i am the person that people cite as "most likely not to return this email"
As you're reading this I'm en route to PEI in hopes of being by my Nana's side for the last few days she's here with us.
As Capote is the author of revered works like In Cold Blood and Breakfast at Tiffany's, its not surprising that his time in the house has defined the property somewhat. But Capote wasn't the owner of the house. He rented the basement apartment from owner Oliver Smith, who was himself a revered fellow in the art world.
Ewww.
Hmm... I guess not having *ever* been to school, it's a downside that many people say I have no right to be anti-school, because I've never experienced it (though apparently it's okay to be against poverty, even if you've never experienced it... This isn't to say that school and poverty are equal in bad-ness at all! Just to say that the argument leaves something to be desired...).
Journey to Muckross House
which blurting reminds, or how you, intricate
Miami came out on top thanks to the inspired play of LeBron. He has rarely been better than he was in game one. From start to finish he dominated all facets of the game. Watching it I thought to myself “dear god, if he plays like this for the entire playoffs, there is no way the Heat do not raise the trophy.” Game two saw a bit of tentative play on Bron’s side – ie. not taking it to the hole when he was being guarded by Baron Davis (who has played remarkably by the way) and missing free throws that could have been very costly.
There’s been little political polling since 2008 focused on young Christians in particular, though a new book by Barna Group President David Kinnaman describes the top reasons many are veering from traditional churches and their positions.
But then Sunday night, I got the crazy idea to just try it, and see how it went. I wanted to put the new nursery curtains up, get his cleaned and pressed and hung up, and THEN do it. But, we decided to wing it.
The physics are floaty, reminiscent of LittleBigPlanet. You and objects tend to stay in the air for a few moments. Objects and platforms have weight and will tip over an edge. The physics are the basis of some puzzles.
FlexLight…solar-powered hybrid utility light
“No, we must see if he’s… playing the fiddle.”
3. Positive Reinforcement
Hope everyone is having a good start to their month.
The Grim Side of Bins
I have a feeling that people my age, have a totally different feeling about this than younger people.
(From top to bottom and left to right)
GREENE CC, BEAVER GT. A study of mass influenza inoculation in a large industry. J Occup Med 1960; 2: 363-370.
And the piece de resistance . . . . . .
It's interesting to note that when my children were Aurora's age, and having their first adventures with solid food, digital cameras had only just trickled onto the market, the internet wasn't generally available, and a mobile phone was beyond the dreams of the average working person.
The Bahraini Interior Ministry and information affairs authority did not respond to several requests by phone and text message for a comment on the incident.
The project instructions are clear, with plenty of photo examples, as well as black & white diagrams. DBE is a must have for beginners, and a nice supplement for advanced artists.
the lowliest chores, let them be brief in Africa. For, how else can we hope
Another connection between Sepia Saturday & facebook this week was regarding the groom in the photo in This post from November It was of wedding I attended at The GuildHall in The City of London.The groom (who i named in the post )was Claus Friehe.he must have goggled his name and found my post.He contacted me this week on facebook & we are back in touch after 40 years.
Tip your face downwards while looking in the mirror to see where the shadows fall under the cheekbones. If your cheekbones are not prominent, feel along your face and apply bronzer in a medium shade in a line just under it to form the hallows of the cheek. Rimmel Sun Shimmer bronzing powder gives a good colour that suits most skin tones. Mac Bronzer in refined golden is quite highly pigmented so apply with a lighter touch.
Klout: 41
So once upon a time I wrote a book about a magic gay fish...
I said “Nice to see you again,” and he responded, “Yes…tomorrow…” There was a pause and, realizing his mistake, we both laughed together. It was refreshing to know that he knew only about as much english as I knew Japanese.
We’re spending 3 weeks on holiday in the US, and it just so happens that we’re going to be in Boulder over the Memorial Day long weekend.
Race riots had occurred in America before, but never in this context. Suddenly, so declared the federal government, this apparently very dangerous group of people were going to be free to frequent any entertainment venue, sporting event, or means of transport that Euro-Americans did. Their children would be free to roam the halls of white schools. Any neighborhood they desired to live in, they now could. And no longer could anyone infringe upon their right to vote into office people exactly like themselves.
that said, go here, for laptop decals, iphone cases, and prints. i'll add more later, these are just the prints i had on hand.
But it is not over yet
Without spoiling anything too much, I hope, Dragons are in one way everything you would expect them to be and at the same time they’re everything you wouldn’t and for that Rachel… I would like to pledge my undying love. The prose is beautiful. Shifting from the expected choices for the opinions of Phina to the cold, detached, almost forensic wording of the Dragons. And the transition isn’t jarring. The two styles work well together in the context of this book, however, if I have one criticism it is… Would all the readers of this book be able to read and fully understand all of the writing without the use of a thesaurus? (That’s not a slight against the author but rather the education system.) Some of the word choices seem a little bit… obscure for what is being sold as a Children’s book. And I just wonder if it will be as appreciated as it deserves to be because of that.
Are prices still falling? The index was flat in the month followings a 2.2% dcline in February 2012, 1.9% monthly decline in January 2012 which was also up from the 1.7% decline in December 2011 and 1.5% decline in November 2011 but in the same range as the 2.2% decline in October 2011, the 1.5% decline in September 2011 and the 1.6% decline in August 2011.
Thanks for joining me on this journey!
_____I am just a guy standing in front of a girl and asking her to 'Move b***h get out the way'
of me—and then pleasure
I also presumed the late Marti Caine would be up-herself, as she was a talent-show-to-stardom person and looked a bit damaged on-screen (therefore dangerous off-screen). I could not have been more wrong. I don’t normally gush, but…
I got to do some crafting while doing a day at the Antique Store this week- heres just a peek-
Anarchy burger!
There’s been so much chatter about it in the media that I almost felt reading the book would be superfluous – you know how when you watch a movie trailer and you figure you’ve just seen all the best parts? But I decided this was one time when it was worth seeing for myself what all the fuss was about.
I don't get that urge or what they call maternal instinct. In fact, I'm 99 percent sure my ovaries literally shut down and steel barriers form in my uterus. I go into total lockdown. Whatever the opposite of maternal instinct is, that's what I have.
Of course, it's difficult not to wonder what this might sound like applied to radically other architectural styles and structural types, from, say, the Seagram Building or the Forth Bridge to troglodyte homes in Cappadocia. Further, it would be interesting to see this applied not just to plans or sections—not just to architectural representations—but to three-dimensional structures in real-time. Laser scans of old ruins turned from visual information to live sound, broadcast 24 hours a day on dedicated radio stations installed amidst the fallen walls of old temples, or acoustically rediscovering every frequency at which Mayan subwoofers once roared.
I play Agent Bothwick, a colleague of FDR and Tuck within the CIA who gets drafted onto FDR’s (Chris Pine’s) team in the war against Tuck (Tom Hardy). Bothwick is FDR’s right hand man, so to speak, and does a lot of the technical work when it comes to spying on, researching and sabotaging Tuck in his pursuit of romantic relations with Lauren (Reese Witherspoon). He’s a consummate professional in the beginning, but he evolves into a bit of a comedic sidekick. We see quite a bit of him in the film and he/I got to deliver a couple of pretty funny lines. Tuck had his own CIA sidekick, Agent Boyles played by the very funny Kevin O’Grady.
It has always been raining in Queensland. The irony of the Sunshine State, it always rains in Summer.
What’s with this addiction to fake food?
Lt. Harvey L. Harrell, 49, New York, N.Y.
ISBN 978-1-4002-0375-8, 224 pp.,
You’ve been in a number of different films and TV series – who have been your favourite actors/actresses to work with so far and why?
The line for orders was long and I had to wait while the people filed by asking for drinks and food. She was eventually able to come out from behind the counter to exchange a hug and a few good words, but the people kept arriving and the orders needed to be filled.
Raban.: Or, by the two fishes we may understand the Prophets, and the Psalms, for the whole of the Old Testament was comprehended in these three, the Law, the Prophets, and the Psalms.
I remembered having heard something about the film during the university years, but I must have totally dismissed it. So there it was, a film from over a decade ago, yet brand new to me…
One of the things that I want to change about my blogging is to be more honest. To be real with you without sharing too much of my private life. I learn so much from the bloggers that I follow and I appreciate your encouragement and words of wisdom. That is the beauty of the blogging community. That's why I've chosen to be more open. Life isn't as picture perfect as I try to make it look sometimes. It is real and sometimes messy, but I am so thankful for friends and family who walk through these trials and triumphs with me.
Remove from the heat and stir in the onion, cayenne pepper and your chosen cheese.
Everyone could appreciate to help unique that all to easy to cope with mobile phone. It really is uncomplicated ring finger accomplish capabilities might make everyone outrageous to help unique the item. Also, having exclusive element connected with ‘microsoft’ Outlook, a single can certainly quickly look at personal in addition to office e-mail. What’s more, it are available set with 2.0 megapixel video camera, Gps system likewise seeing that Wireless connections element. At this point, we will allowed HTC snap and that is great intended for particular likewise seeing that small business work with.
In the US, college professors from the most respected institutions in the Ivy League (Harvard, Princeton, Yale, etc…) have been publishing books on the culminating of global financial instability for years (such as Elizabeth Warren, Robert Shiller, and Paul Krugman). Private researchers have been also warning about it for years or even decades (including Robert Prechter, Jim Shepherd, and myself).
Hello - Citric Acid, Potassium, Phosphorus, Magnesium, and Vitamin C!
Before we get on the highway, Henri pulls over to gas up the truck. As he works the pump, I start looking through an atlas he keeps on the middle of the seat. We’ve had the atlas since we arrived on this planet. It has lines drawn to and from every place we’ve ever lived. At this point, there are lines crisscrossing all of the United States. We know we should get rid of it, but it’s really the only piece of our life together that we have. Normal people have photos and videos and journals; we have the atlas. Picking it up and looking through it, I can see Henri has drawn a new line from Florida to Ohio. When I think of Ohio, I think of cows and corn and nice people. I know the license plate says
- Blue eyes
It is very sad to hear that Monica Sone passed away.
“Sometimes we have to be careful because she just wants to play so much and she still has a splint on,” Meaden laughed. “She’s just such a great puppy and I’m so glad she will be going to a great and loving home.”
Let's not forget the salads, hams and breads. And of course, beer, cider and champagne.
After the first week of the Easter half term break, the children all came down with a particularly unpleasant viral bug. I think I mentioned it in my last post. You know the type. Sore throats, lots of snot, coughing a plenty! At one point, after several nights without sleep and five children all coughing themselves sick, I honestly thought I was going a little bit bonkers! Washing bed linen every day because it has been vomited on is zero fun, and can only lead to one very tired mummy!
May 19 - Harmon Killebrew, Hall of Fame baseball player (Minnesota Twins), 74
Whether this is the common daisy (Bellis perennis) - Bellis is Latin for "in time of war" and perennis is Latin for "everlasting" - or an ox-eye, dog or moon daisy (Leucanthemum vulgare) I couldn't say.
My eyes burnt with commanding desire
She’s no longer in pain.
See, this whole thing pains me because we actually like Best Buy and their warranties. We were really hoping that they would pull through for us on this item. But, no such luck. So Saturday morning, I'm pulling into HH Gregg and buying my kitchen set. With cash - cause that's how we roll.
Race record: Starts 21; 1st: 6; 2nd: 5; 3rd: 5; Win & Place Prize Money: £296,500
This was huge back in 1975 - certainly where I lived anyway. Poor old Stefan. I always reckoned that because he was "different" the police didn't look for anyone else - a typical case of "fitting" someone up to fit the crime instead of getting off their fat arses and finding the real culprit.
The end of warm days and light, the onset of the dark, and the cold claws of winter.
We started with the greige paint color (Valspar's Magic Spell), added in the chandelier and mirror last week, and today we installed a couple floating shelves and added some accessories:
And then it hit me. He WANTS to read. So I've been trying to help him a bit every single evening, as we sit up on his bed exploring his books. But it's been the working with one series that has made him super excited and that is Brand New Readers. (I wrote a blog post about them on my very very neglected books blog; you can check out the post here.) Through these books, he has become a super motivated reader, trying to sound out words, still relying on tons of support from me to get through the words, but he's loving it. And because the end goal is NOT for him to read right now (sometime before Kindergarten would be nice), it's just sweet times with him and me, enjoying the funny pictures and trying to sound out words together. As he curls up against me, enjoying the books, excited about figuring out a few words here and there, he's absolutely gleeful. And I'm absolutely loving this sweet sweet time with my boy, before he kicks me out of bed so that he can read on his own. (Admittedly, a part of me is actually looking FORWARD to that day as well.)
resenting your birth order
The most blatant example of what I'm talking about was a recent contestant on the Food Network's Chopped. At the beginning of the episode, she was all bravado about her credentials as a Cordon Bleu Culinary Arts graduate. As the show progressed, and her fortunes sunk, she increasingly blamed her missteps on her sister having recently died. In one of the post-mortem on-camera interviews, she expressed bemusement that she wasn't given a leg up due to her fragile emotional state, and then looked straight into the camera, saying with defiant smugness (as well as a total lack of grief): "Hello! Death!"
experiences increase with growth and handicaps allow one to grow.
I follow up and follow through because this is the natural way of my being. I receive Abundant Blessings Overflowing in and through my life.
“In 2011 cybercriminals greatly expanded their reach, with nearly 20 percent of targeted attacks now directed at companies with fewer than 250 employees,” said Stephen Trilling, Symantec chief technology officer. “We’ve also seen a large increase in attacks on mobile devices, making these devices a viable platform for attackers to leverage in targeting sensitive data. Organizations of all sizes need to be vigilant about protecting their information.”
I observed Ms. Lemon’s class this week and was struck by just how many study skills and self-direction skills the use of the iPad encourages in the classroom. Ms. Lemon served as orchestrator, conductor and coach in the observed lesson period–but the children directed their learning and took charge of their own study skills. As I interviewed various students, they all spoke of the independence the iPad gave them in accomplishing goals their teacher set out for them. One technology tool is just that–a tool, but in the hands of capable teachers who are designing lessons that use the iPad to enhance instruction, differentiate instruction and give students power over their own learning–that is a true education.
Hence the silos. Hence the fact that every organization in the world will tell you that communications is their biggest challenge. They will tell you how they hope for more cooperation. But the truth is that because all are locked in a life and death struggle to get more from the budget, cooperation is impossible. For the foolish and naive executive to play the game any differently, I plead guilty here, means only that you lose and so do your people.
if I place the sceptre in your hands
How can I want something but have a hard time with it. How can I be grateful for the opportunity, but still wish for other things? How can I know it is important and still feel so unimportant? How can I describe to YOU what I am even talking about! This is one strange ramble!
make love not war
And suddenly it all clicked.
The Dow Jones Industrial fell approximately 40% after I wrote this now famous “Stock Market Obituary,” finally hitting bottom on March 9, 2009, when the Dow Jones Industrial Average hit 6,440.
Thank you to all who have been checking in on me, touching base, and praying for my dad. Unfortunately (for me) and fortunately (for him), my dad joined the rest of our family in Heaven on Sunday night. Around the time my dad passed, I was asking God for a "rescue," and it wasn't until yesterday that I realized my father has the ultimate rescue... to be be with God in Heaven!
Supplies: Superhero Paper Package, Holiday Red Cardstock, Card Word Puzzle and Super Powers My Acrylix, Grey Wool Ink, Clear Detail Embossing Powder, foam tape (all CTMH).
If by some chance you are an agent, I sincerely apologize for the misdirection.
For the name of the alien race, I wanted harsh sounds, and it had to include a Z (you’ll understand why, if you read the book). After trying out a lot of names, I was eventually inspired by the word “Buzzard” which conjures up images of an ugly, carrion-eating bird. So the aliens became “Bzadians” which incorporates the same sounds.
“But it’s not, though is it? It’s down to your inability and that of one of the largest mental health trusts in Europe to pull on resources which are consistent with managing just one passively resistant patient. Why can’t you ring your managers or MH trust managers to have someone authorise the necessary contingency arrangements? You are a major health trust, you must have out of hours arrangements and some contingency planning? And it’s only fair I inform you that I’m now going to record your threats to walk out and leave the man, in case that should become relevant during any investigation subsequently.”
A cement orchid among hot dog stands,
Leonard Mlodinow
I had heard that Ram Dass had gone down to Brazil to visit Joao’s well-known healing center, known as the Casa, and had had very good things to say about it. He compared the loving, heart-opening atmosphere he discovered there to the feelings he had only experienced previously at his Guru’s ashram in India, although he did not receive any physical healing of the stroke symptoms that had prompted the visit. I told him my story of meeting John of God, and receiving the repeated admonition to head to Brazil. Since Ram Dass had had a positive experience down there, I asked him if he thought it would be worth the trip for me to go. After a brief closed-eye contemplation, he responded, “Given your attitude, I don’t think it would do you any good,” and we both cracked up; it was so clearly the truth about me! I am famous for going to places like that in order to demonstrate that they don’t work for me. I have a reputation to uphold as the 99th Monkey, the proverbial one who never gets it. (It’s a really crummy job, trust me. You wouldn’t want to be me.)
Bernie Allen (English Democrats) 120 (3%)
The Welsh Education Minister needs to put his own house in order before criticising others.
“But with whom was he angry forty years? Was it not those who sinned, whose bodies fell in the wilderness? And to whom did he swear that they would not enter his rest, if not to those who were disobedient? So we see that they were unable to enter because of unbelief.
And, in parting from you now,
Easter weekend was designed to make anyone in the hospitality industry feel like a social recluse. So I went to (cue pompous accent) Kearsney College for their rugby festival this weekend all the way in the Rupublic of Hillcrest. It was great, if getting lost in a sea of La Coste and Range Rovers is your thing. Every pre-pubescent jackass with a vest was there with cardigans, v-neck-look-at-my-shaven-chest-shirt and their R50 Mr Price sunglasses. Yes, I’m talking about you, idiot that was working in the BOSS ice tea stand. You knob. Oh and by the way, I see these days that shorts, are now actually short. Really short. I’ve never been so grateful to be an 80′s baby.
I thought I was done with anxiety dreams after that. But this week, they came back. I guess we're just getting to close to the actual day.
Last year, was a year of giving the teacher Snickers (my favorite candy). Although I loved seeing all the Snickers, baked cookies and ice cream it was not healthy! This year, I would like to pack my lunch the night before and put in healthy snacks. I am determined to loose what I gained this year.
college and still has a little puch with the hat/lace-up waist coat, and
I only lied cause I wanted her to be able to trust me!
As the tension, hunger, and feelings of deprivation build, the compulsion to eat becomes too powerful to resist: a “forbidden” food is eaten; a dietary rule is broken. With an all-or-nothing mindset, you feel any diet slip-up is a total failure. After having a bite of ice cream, you might think, “I’ve already blown It, so I might as well go all out.”
(Sorry, no photos or details. Not my story to share.)
GAUGE: 9 sts = 2’’; 6 rnds = 1’’ (stockinette st). See page 22, “You Must Be Sure to Check Your Gauge.”
HOW a bacterium or weed becomes resistant, or a species becoming resistant in general, is determined by their genetics. Let me pose a scenario for you. Weeds are easier since they don't have any abnormal mating habits so that's where I'll go.
10. When you have sinfully acted towards your spouse confess to one another; and ask for forgiveness of each other, and join in prayer to God for pardon; and this will act as a preventative in you the next time: you will surely be ashamed to do that which you have confessed and asked forgiveness for of God and man.(25)
But every glottal stop of my professor wakes me up like the worst linguistic alarm clock because oh god she noticed but I’m awake my eyes are open what does she think I’m doing? I’m paying so much attention (reconciling those bills, bills, bills of consciousness) but oh no, not again, sinking further into sleep– I am a school shark and when I stop caring about your most horrible class then I die an intellectual death that starts with fatigue and ends with my head on the table, snoring. I just want to close my eyes, just for a minute, I promise not to go to sleep and I won’t even close my eyes all the way. So cool, I can see my eyelashes, each one, so close.
I do want to say a few words about yesterday's regrettable lapse in judgment without getting into too much detail. I wish to extend my sincerest apologies to the couple who contacted me through their attorneys. I chose your name at random and am very sorry (and surprised) that people took the trouble to look you up and make harassing telephone calls. I really thought people had better things to do with their time. I hope that what I have done to make amends is satisfactory to you. I was also surprised that so many people readily believed the patently absurd actions I jokingly attributed to Atrios. While I disagreed with his Blogroll Amnesty Day and I am not particularly delighted by such pieces as "Why Your Blog Sucks," he is certainly not as bad as all that and I am shocked that so many people would be ready to believe the worst about him. I hope he will accept my apology, though I guess I can give up all hope that he will ever link to me now.
Congressman Barzaga: Are you single?
. . . how much fun I had at book club Tuesday night - met another new friend. She and I clicked and I can't wait to be at another book club night.
One night, Albert's father makes a bet with some other farmers that he can have Joey "pulling a plow before the end of the week." Joey resists, kicking Albert's father and accidentally injuring him. He considers killing Joey for this, but Albert, now 15 and taller than his father, protests. His father than warns him that he'll sell Joey if he can't get him to pull a plow. Albert inists that he can train Joey to pull a plow as expected.
The South African National Editors Forum said it was "preposterous". Right 2 Know "condemned" the DA. And, as if to set the bar so high no one else might exceed it, Pierre de Vos described the decision as "even more" than astonishing.
Operating System : Android 2.3 GINGERBREAD
3/31/12 I am thankful
These notes would then be assembled at the end of the week, a few clips from key episodes chosen, and a show edited together, mostly composed of clips. The show could consist of a number of short segments such as:
Beat the Winter Blues with Citron Yellow
SiZE…… : 62.9 MB
Each and every spell suitably strange and full of Wampus Country.
We sure were busy last week!! Hopefully this week won't be so eventful!!
Soon-mi is itty-bitty. I'm sure she's around my age—at most maybe a year or two younger. Yet she stands a full head shorter than me.
We would like to take this opportunity to highlight some fantastic businesses who have already come on board to support this great charity and our team.
I can think of several areas where through working with others I think I'm making a difference. Not necessarily going to always win, but could well limit serious damage to the nation. First up is what I consider the madness of onshore wind farms. I feel part of a growing outrage amongst MPs over the damage this policy is inflicting - on fuel poverty, business competitiveness and rural landscapes. Already we are seeing more under grounding of grid lines, and I still hope we can defeat the utterly outrageous Mid Wales Connection Project. I know I'm out of line with the Secretary of State for Energy and Climate Change about this - but the whips have never raised this issue with me. I really feel that I am defending the UK for future generations. On its own, this war makes my job as an MP worthwhile.
What we have here is the perfect end product of the long backlash against liberalism, however we choose to define that much-maligned concept - a man explaining to his readers that popular entertainment does not always accurately reflect measurable reality, in tones that suggest he fully believes that he is imparting some essential, transcendent revelation.
Which is unusual cos aside from a few mini kiddie intensives this is a quiet time for me.
Chicken Noodle Soup
The tags were cut using the Tim Holtz tag die - it is such a great size for decorating. The labels were cut with a MFT label die, and the little birds were punched out of the paper with a SU 3/4" circle punch.
1. A multiplication of petty annoyances, and a sudden intolerance for them?
No one could have felt more awkward in junior high than I did. I was the new kid in a bigger town and it was my first foray into the American public school system after being educated in the Deep South by one of the finer, yet seemingly sheltered private schools in Alabama. Prior to that, my entire educational career had taken place overseas where my parents promptly enrolled us into an international, English-speaking school in Europe.
Pollack-y pollenart on white Mazda pickup. Plus random tiny bug.
-The kind woman at JC Penney who, when I asked where she found her coupon for $20 off, said they came in the mail and then just handed it to me, saying she was only going to use the $10 off one (you had to spend a certain amount per coupon). I was buying a down comforter for my bed, and that $20 off, plus the half off sale in the store, made it an amazing deal. People are so kind.
Unwind, unravel all night long
“I have never felt our being driven out was anything other than a blessing. Of course, father lost a small fortune in farm lands, mills, home etc. but I am glad I was brought up in the good old USA,” he wrote in the travel log.
The ultimate point of my PhD on the London and South Western Railway’s (LSWR) management between 1870 and 1910 is to determine the quality of managers' and directors' decisions in the period. Therefore, I deal with questions surrounding what drove decisions and what decision-makers knew when making them. One event I focus on is the LSWR and Midland Railway’s lease of the Somerset and Dorset Railway (SDR) in 1875.
“Would you like to see my postcards?” my newfound friend asked. “Why not?” I thought, imagining we’d spend a few minutes perusing some interesting cards from exotic locations. It was at this point that I discovered what separates the true fan from the mere dilettante.
This past weekend our GS Ambassador Troop celebrated our final Troop Meeting with a special send off dinner at one of our fave local restaurants, Centro.
2354 kg sweet flag ( a type of grass)
As 2012 neared and finally rolled around, I made a conscious effort to stop feeling a sense of personal failure whenever I was given directive on a Friday to get something on-air or worse, off-air, the following Monday. Under such circumstances you do the best you can do and some factors are out of your control. But I was getting there. I had accepted the fact that suggestions at improving communication and streamlining processes were not likely to be entertained, that even basic minimal operational enhancements would be an uphill struggle, even if they made perfect sense in my mind. The lights would remain off and I could adapt to working in the dark, or not. So, darkness it was.
I should mention that the house also has a full sized 1979-vintage Wolf range. Not the made-for-home variety, but the real commercial deal. Griddle, salamander, two ovens, six untamed gazillion-BTU gas burners. 48 inches and 2 tons of unbridled power in electronics-free black steel. She will from henceforth be called La Bête.
7And you are to make your peace-offerings, feasting there with joy before the Lord your God.
What a dope I've been. This means I'll never have to see another Kate Hudson movie.
Tattoos of memories and dead skin on trial.
That is until Thea finds a baby in a manger…
Only two people in this world don't judge me on my looks. They embarrass my new uniform, and loved me when I was fat. They love me when I'm medium, and when i was so strung out that I looked like I could fall through my asshole and hang myself. My parents. I trust and love my parents. I went through a fase where I thought they were the reason I began using drugs. The infidelity, the denial of my drug problem. I understand now that they just did not want to believe that I would do something so drastic and perhaps even stupid. Risking my life, whoring myself. Sharing needles. Contacting Hep C.
Product Line Position: Market Share, Vendor Position, Profitability, Margins, Technology Position, Market Awareness
Within her arms and there to rest
He twisted his head to look to the quays
-Alicia
This is an easy project that anyone can do. It would look great in most rooms including a bathroom, entry way, laundry room, master bedroom or daughters, room!
Calla loves summer because summer means Duncan. They’ve been best friends for years, but Calla has never worked up the nerve to tell him how she really feels. This summer, the summer before college, is Calla’s last chance.
Emily is in her junior year of high school and is studying hard this year. She also is having her best year ever playing basketball for the Girls Varsity Hudsonville Hornets team. Also new for Emily as of this past fall, she is involved weekly leading worship at our church's youth worship service that meets on Sunday night. It's very exciting to see her living out this role for which God has greatly gifted her.
Customer Service for both Call Center Representatives and Service Providers and Customer Service Associates in Non-Call Center Industries
Cheri Cheri Maria
He says "I think you're in there Rob. You and Jamie make a lovely couple"
Since I first read about an online baking group attempting a recipe from Dorie's tome of tried and true breads, cakes, pies, and puddings each week then writing about their results along with the rest of the group, I've wanted to be a part of it. I figured that it would encourage me to bake more often, and bake things that I wouldn't normally choose to bake myself for whatever reason. In these last couple of years, I've learned that the moment Swiss buttercream comes together is a wondrous event, crystallized ginger can be revived through steaming, rugelach may be my favorite pastry, and the freezer is every baker's friend -- all valuable lessons that will serve me well in this lifetime.
--Why did that relationship end that way?
The article is to my mind not unreasonable and quotes Dominic Wyse from the Institute of Education. However, there is one major misconception at the heart of the article: that is, this test is going to be testing 'reading'.
And honestly I felt better for having published it anyway, no need for you to know how I feel.
In less than 10 minutes, he came out of the store, carrying the milk, and wearing a big grin on his face. He handed me my change and we were off.
* 2 tablespoons tomato paste
Now that Santorum is gone, someone has to stay in the race, if only to make Mitt Romney seem like a reasonable candidate in comparison.
Something Prism did not care for.
There remains perhaps a foot of trunk, rather barked. My husband says there is no hope of regeneration but of course we will leave it in place this season. I’d settle for anything, however bizarrely shaped.
After falling for 30-years, short-term interest rates are bottoming out. The long-term 10-year U.S. Treasury, it’s yielding a pathetic 2%-- a 50-year low. All cycles come to end. And I believe we are near the end of a long-term down cycle in interest rates.
In the best spirit of research, we will test our hypothesis that an open access, top-tier journal run by scientists will be better for scientists when eLife is launched next year. The proof will be in the reading and the service it delivers.
Oh, and feel free to contact me for more information or to consult with me regarding health and fitness.
I wonder if we’ll still be theeing and thouing in two hundred years time? Smart money’s on yes.
Curry leaves-10,finely chopped
Today we have a terrific interview with Stacey O’Neale, who is (in my opinion) a very well-known, very helpful member of the writing community via Twitter and blogworld. She’s been kind enough to answer my questions on indie publishing (her answers may surprise you!) as well as her favorite upcoming YA authors and the importance of social media.
Chinese Beautiful
Ummm....HELL NO!
It was enough
That being so, she found she could forgive
Natalia cannot go home to share her grief with Bako because she and another doctor, Zorá, must deliver medicine and give inoculations at an orphanage in Brejevina, a coastal city across the border. She feels obligated to complete this act of coöperation because it was soldiers from her country who, in the recently ended war, orphaned the children.
The list can go on and on. They could not have foreseen the world we live in, and I am positive that if they had, they would have written a different set of codes and laws to govern us by.
But for now, bear with me. I shall be back soon with some eyeshadow that Boots sent me to review, and some heartbreaking tales of dressmaking failure. Make-up and dresses. It's all going to go a bit bimbo over here.
I chose Giant Flowers along with Art Philosophy. Are you tired of my flower projects yet? My goal is to make all the flowers in the cart. So far I've made the lotus, daisy, ashley, and poppy. So I have three more: peony, rose, and the hibiscus. Today I'm showing the peony. Originally the peony was suppose to be part of the fall wild flower bouquet that I showed for the blog hop over the weekend. But the peony does not have a bottom, its made in a ring with no backing. You can see in the sneak peak, the purple showing at the bottom is the background paper, you can also see the leaf stems peaking through too. I was not sure how I would make a bouquet of peonies, attaching the stem would be tricky. So I ended up making a home decor project, wall art. Again its Fall theme using the same paper as the Wild Flower Bouquet, CTMH Dreamin'.
John Cage - Indeterminacy - 1959
Below is the same example with typesizes indicated. But why these numbers?
In fact I am feeling very bitter that I have of course left it too late to get tickets to one of the 11 performances in Sydney of ‘Richard the Third’ directed by Sam Mendes with Kevin Spacey in the lead role, that judging by the reviews in London looks as if it might be a strong contender to join the ‘Fabulous Five’
hopefully she'll have goodtimes
- Mix salt and peper.
I can’t think of a plot.
Eliza Presley may not appear in your follower list. Eliza Presley may have decided to stop following you, or the account may have been suspended for a Terms of Service violation.
While overseas in China, Simon managed to rope in his friend Marty Campaign to join him as Operations Manager, a bar specialist who helped propel The Glamour bar and el Coctel in Shanghai to become hip and happening hotspots.
Ink: Memento Rich Cocoa
Effective strike action and general strikes cannot be organized unless we first either take over our unions, or else build new unions and other workers. organizations with a new leadership. Our current union misleaders' attitude is that they are only responsible to act in the interest of the dues-paying membership – not the future members, not the unorganized workers, not the unemployed, and certainly not the workers of the world, oppressed, exploited and brutalized as we are by Wall Street and the military industrial war machine. But our class can only survive and win if we take up the old Knights of Labor slogan: An Injury to One Is an Injury to All! Solidarity is our only power, and the ability to strike in the historic interest of the class is our strongest weapon. When the leaders of today's unions spurn these tools of the international working class, they act as the agents of the ruling class in our organizations, and must be driven out and replaced. That means we need rank-and-file class struggle caucuses to promote a new militant leadership, to fight for working class independence, and to build a fighting workers/labor party that unites the entire working class and all our allies nationally and internationally to strike as one against the rule of the exploiters and build a movement for workers' power and workers' ownership of the means of production.
I loaded sixteen tons of number nine coal
Nevertheless, Incurso stands as a megalith of modern death metal and a genre landmark, offering astonishing technical wizardry that, right now, seems impossible to match, let alone surpass. It does lack a bit of feeling and some people will quickly dismiss it as "technical wankery" - and they're not totally wrong. But if you call yourself a tech death fan, you are not allowed to miss this.
This approach requires that a parent delay a response to a negative situation with a child until it is clearly understood what the true need of the child is; the reaction is in a manner that strictly addresses the need.This sounds pretty good. Figure out what the underlying need is before reacting. Yes.
"Miz A, you are a playa!" ~ my sister
6) Clay Buchholz has 3 wins this season, tying him for 9th with a host of other pitchers in the MLB this season. What those other pitchers don’t have, though, is Buchholz’s 8.69 ERA. In fact, only one other pitcher of the top 36 pitchers in wins this year has an ERA over 5.00. That man, Ivan Nova (Yankees, 5.18 ERA), hasn’t lost in 15 regular-season decisions, which hasn’t happened in over 50 years.
Not all the ground is well-trod, either. Conquest is, for example, the only Méliès film I’ve seen with a subplot: in this case involving a group of suffragettes (played, without sympathy, by burly women) who demand to join the trip. Méliès also tinkers with his dramatic structure, allowing his lead aeronaut, Professor Crazyloft, to treat his guests, and us, to a demonstration of how the craft will fly, using a scale model. (In keeping with Méliès’ dubious commitment to physics, this demo justifies nothing we’ll see later on, but it does make certain scenes more logical.) He also films one of Conquest’s automobile sequences outdoors--rare for this director--though the car is repainted to match Méliès’ cartooned hyper-reality. There’s even a brief closeup, late in the film.
Than to fade away
If Joan does not have them yet, I am sure she will soon, and or can order them for you, I got them as a gift for being part of a design team. Thanks.
Then, I went in and stamped the outline butterfly repeatedly to finish the pattern!
Mr. Lapu-Lapu 2011 is a local male beauty pageant-cum-physical competition in search of the MODERN-DAY HERO.
Who ordered this toilet?
1.Self honoring. I know that my partner walks a spiritual path, connected to Spirit and his intuition to become his greatest self. He does this and takes risks to bring more light to the world.
My in-laws were also a big help. My mother-in-law came over a couple of times to watch E. while I went to the lumberyard for supplies and my father-in-law helped me (as he often does) bring home the armoire in his SUV.
Friday 6th April: Day off work!!! So out to Inveruglas for 9am to climb Ben Vorlich. We got up and down in 5 hours, with 8.5 miles of terrain & a cairn to be found after a 945 metre ascent.
Splice may not totally cohere in the end, but it's still worth seeing for the questions it raises, some brilliantly freaky imagery and a pair of fine lead performances that lend emotional gravity to the film even at its most over-the-top.
The little book is written professionally from the perspective of a woman new to agriculture, being dragged up to speed by a very driven fiancee cum husband . I especially liked the passages about the couple getting to know & use their working horses. These narratives underwrite the saga lending it strength & truth.
To-date I can find no Marriage, Death or Census records for him in any of these three countries!
As for the justification that Atlantic Yards is a transit hub, I too believe that, to an extent and within reason, this should be taken into consideration as future Noticing New York posts will make clear, but I commend to you some thinking urban planner Alex Garvin offered when considering Atlantic Yards. He suggested we are doing a lot of what is referred to as `transit-oriented development’ and what we should be doing instead is providing a lot of `development-oriented transit.’ (See: Tuesday, July 22, 2008, At MCNY panel, defending dissent and promoting the better way to develop (not like Atlantic Yards)
Erle Frayne D. Argonza / Ra
WHAT: One of a kind cask from Austin Beerworks—with the beer you get a free moutsache glass to add to your collection. The beer is called Mr. Falcon—part Fire Eagle and part Black Thunder dry hopped with Amarillo and Centinnial hops. Folks from ABW and BTA will be on hand to celebrate.
In my country it is generally accepted that a register of emotions, from sadness to enthusiasm and joy, has been labeled feminine in its manifestations, and furthermore, that register is construed as an aspect of femininity we despise: irrationality, sensitivity, romanticism and emotionalism.
2004: .287/.411/.609 with 7 homers
Since I'm clearly not in the right frame of mind for decision making, I'm off to see what I can part with and throw them all in boxes! These helpful and simple declutter tactics and this awesome post on 99 ways to simplify life with kids are giving me some strength! I want to live more simply, a "tiny life", in a organized and refreshing atmosphere that doesn't stress me out every time I open a cabinet door looking for a cake pan, and tons of old pots and such fall on my toe.
Kegel exercises (Kegels) are exercises designed to strengthen the muscles of the lower pelvic girdle, or pelvic floor—the pubococcygeal (PC) muscles. The PC muscles support the bladder, urethra, and urethral sphincter—the muscle group at the neck of the bladder that acts as a spigot for controlling urine flow into the urethra—and the vagina, uterus, and rectum.
You have a script, a video camera, and a great performance to launch your web series.
So when she made Puliyum Molakum for me as soon as I reached home last month, I asked her to pose for me, for a photograph which she did very happily! Today, I saw her searching for onions so that she could make another bowl full for me...just for me :-)
1. We may be going into Bad Neighborhoods, but, in the words of my professor, "I don't care how much you cry, or if your parents call the dean. You are GOING to your assigned locations, or you don't graduate. So deal."
My grandmother and her coworkers would come to Park Delicatessen specifically if they wanted the choice cuts of meat, and more gourmet level of quality to their meals which weren't limited to sandwiches. The higher quality came at a higher price which their salaries as nurses, secretaries and the like couldn't afford on a daily basis. I do recall seeing the doctors making their rounds at Park Delicatessen without fail.
What are you up to this weekend? Will you be attending any of the Cabot Circus shows? Let me know by commenting below…
This curriculum provides Bible, Social Studies, Geography, Biology, Science, Language, Life Skills, Art and Crafts lesson ideas. You would need to get a grade-appropriate maths and phonics program to complete your full schooling requirements.
I want to remind you that I’m not here to criticize Obama! I encourage you to ask me or do research yourself on why Obama isn’t necessarily the best choice for America in these trying times! Again, if you voted Democrat in the 2008 election, in Michigan you don’t have to re-register Republican! It’s time to look past political party lines and nominate the most principled, Constitutionally consistent, and honorable statesmen in the race! America needs principles, not politics!
You know what came out of my lips;
For some reason, the blood work was the last thing of the day - it was 6:30 by the time it was over - and the nurses wanted us to wait 2-3 hours for the results. Since we wanted to see Lana before she went to bed, we asked if we could go home first and they could call us if they needed to. There are three possible results for the blood work: pass, fail, or inconclusive. If it's a pass, we won't hear from the hospital at all and we will be at the hospital at 7:30am to proceed with surgery. If it's a fail, (if Maddy had an underlying infection), the hospital will cancel surgery completely. If it's inconclusive, we'll have to wake Maddy to take her in to get more blood taken.
9. Campbell
The camera, unlike other Ikea products, won’t be on sale, but will be given away. In fact the idea is part of a very creative marketing campaign in which customers will be given the camera and will be able to take pictures of the furniture they like and post them on the Ikea website.
"What about on a K-mart receipt? You ever see that?"
Tree‘s music sits at the helm of a collaborative creative effort which also encompasses visual artists. Warrior comes from the upcoming (and much anticipated) album Splitting Branches, and contains a mish-mash of found-sounds including breaking-eggs, toasters and scissors, as well as a neat 8-bit style Gameboy solo.
The five strangers all have sinister secrets which are gradually revealed, The Devil hasn't chosen his victims at random. Watching the action on cctv is Detective Bowden (Chris Messina) and he too is there for a reason.
Samsung Refrigerators Review
If I am honest, I will admit to being upset about someone (her boyfriend of sorts) buying her a car. Not only is it a danger for my mother and to my mother to be behind the wheel, it is a danger to other drivers on the road. I don’t care how much she promises to not drive after drinking, we all are aware of how drinking impairs judgment. It only takes ONE time!
Took great
This empire has been brutally conquering and colonizing territory since the fall of Rome. However, it has only gained an American face in the last century. The United States quickly emerged as the world’s “superpower” primarily through its economic might. For some time, many believed the U.S. to be a shining example of economic freedom for other nations to emulate. Indeed, America was eager to promote “economic freedom” globally to open new markets for U.S.-based corporations.
She leads a molly-coddled life. True sportspeople of the year have struggled against adversity.
Today Stampotique is sponsoring the Pile it On Challenge. The theory behind Pile It On! is to create cards, scrapbook pages or even altered items using MORE THAN ONE challenge. They have found it to be a challenge to see how many challenges they could get into one project. Stampotique is ALSO coming out with a WHOLE new slew of images! Hint: including more from Daniel Torrente , Janet Klein , Kira Nichols and a new line from Roc Nicholas! Woot! Woot!
Many years ago, my best girlfriend and I wanted to attend the Kentucky Derby. It was something to do with wearing a pretty hat, lovely dress and have a fancy-pants day while cheering for our favorite horse. Nah…it was all about the food. We both love a good meal and we couldn’t forget the perfect Mint Julep. So with the Derby just days away, here are some great and authentic tastes that will bring our Old Kentucky home (via Brooklyn & Daytona Beach Fla respectively) into your home worldwide. So grab your favorite hat, cheer for your favorite horse and sip your Julep ya’ll.
I don’t get it, and it frustrates me.
And the African population in South Africa had by then also increased by 50% percent.(source: "a crime against humanity: analysing repression of the Apartheid State", by Max Coleman of the Human Rights Committee).
Follow the Touch Twin & More Challenge blog.
Nothing is sure and everything is waiting, silent, like before a massive storm when even the birds don’t dare sing. Every sound and every scream from me sounds dull, damped or muted. It’s like everyone got on the train and I’m left standing on the station, they did not even bother to wave?
She was killed by a curse meant for me,
2. Listen First, Talk Second: It’s difficult to hear what somebody’s trying to say if you’re interrupting them, or even if you’re thinking of what to say next while they are talking. We all have co-workers who LOVE to listen to themselves talk, however try listening first and speaking second and you will gain tremendous respect from them, and you may actually learn something while you’re at it.
“They are the regulators. The ministry’s secretary-general, Datuk Long See Wool, sits on the board of MAHB. How can he be objective and play fair to the airlines?” he asked.
Okay, First Blog post since the new upgrade to Blogger. I've got to say, I don't quite like it. The images are difficult to past, and I have to go into the HTML editor to delete useless code and get between the images. What a strange and sad change.I would love to complain, but who would listen. Any other bloggers feel the same? I hope so! Maybe I'm missing something......
Let's counter that crappy news with some incredible news. Hot Thing One and Hot Thing Two did NOT move away! (story of HT1 and HT2 here and here and here) They're still right down the street! They've been on a three-month-long vacation which included the entire first month of school (those hot sexy bastards) so everyone just assumed they were gone.
Dear Seasons Buffet at the Manila Pavilion,
Audiophiles have been begging for this for years. I always though the 80s CD releases sounded pretty good, perhaps because I used to listen to the Beatles on scratchy vinyl records. But apparently the mixes could — and will — sound better done on today’s technology. Who am I to argue?
Sauteed Baby Artichokes with Garlic
That being said, I repeat: fun read. Plenty of nifty little concepts, building seamlessly on the universe Morgan created for his main character Takeshi Kovacs in Altered Carbon. I continue to be both creeped out and fascinated by the concept of your consciousness being transportable or containable. When death is so survivable, true ending becomes even more horrific.
*A plethora of options can be liberating, but it can also be paralyzing. That’s why it’s impossible to find anything to watch on TV even though we’ve got something like 2,000 channels at this point. It’s why a song you like randomly played on a radio station or in a grocery store seems super cool, even though you have that same song on your phone and could listen to it whenever you want to, but never do. Like Keanu said, the problem is choice, and that’s been the by-product of the Lebron/DWade union.
Does this make it a BAD thing that Lush did? Or does the end justify the means?
Having come to the last page of the Internet, I amazingly find THE book with THE pattern I HAVE TO HAVE for the yarn I just bought. Quite impulsively, I click the Buy It Now button, without bothering to read any pattern details like gauge, suggested fiber content, yardage, yarn weight. You know, the inconsequential details that might prevent me from buying the book and beginning the process of ...
Events such as this, as well as innumerable others have been captured by photographers for decades. Had there been no photographers there to capture these moments in history, some of these events may have fallen to the wayside and never been thought about again. However, each of these occurrences have taken our country from the bottom to rise to the top, except for 9/11, which proceeded to knock us down and force us to build ourselves back up. They say time flies, and if that isn’t the truth then I don’t know what is. What I do know is I’m thankful to see the world through a camera lens, and hopefully one day one of my images will have some immense effect on the world as some of the above have had an effect on my world.
Night and day all through winter huddling naked
Embellishment: Flowers, charm
So that is the latest with me and I have honestly been an emotional wreck the past month! I’m such a bawl baby and I’ve had quite a few meltdowns. But of course Dan is there to calm me down and make me feel so much better. It’s weird how well he can do that but I couldn’t be more grateful! Now we’re pretty much back in our routine and things are relatively back to normal!
“21 Feb 2012: Shrill libertarian UK pro-smoker Christopher Snowdon publishes clichéd, error-ridden and commentary on plain packs for tobacco industry funded Adam Smith Institute.”
Maus; A Survivor's Tale was drawn on common typing paper with a cheap pen to give it its desperate, this-must-be-told feel. It is the only graphic novel to win the Pulitzer prize.
And then Gai and Mana crystallise and that’s all over.
So here's what's happening: On Saturday/Cinco de Mayo/Beer bong day/Kentucky Derby, four authors have agreed to a second running of last year's THE BET.
The amendment obligating peers to cover their ears and sing lalala loudly and to shout ‘I can’t hear you I can’t hear you’ should such action be necessary was also passed but a clause which would have obliged MPs and peers to flounce out of any room where criticisms of the bill were being mentioned was narrowly defeated.
If you are planning an extension or renovation getting an architects input – especially early on in the process, is invaluable. As an architect this might seem like biased advice but even on a tight budget, it’s worth giving one of us a call. Our firm for example offers a home consultation service where we will advise on the best layout for your space, give suggestions for finishes recommend kitchen suppliers and fitters and if you are planning to extend we will also advise on planning issues, all for a one off fee. www.optimise-design.com
No! Not that SAS the OTHER ones the
and i slept that night, with carolyn’s sweet voice in one ear and my father’s voice in the other.
While the number of pilgrims who will attend is still unclear, if the event succeeds in bringing more than a few thousand, the Ennahda-led Tunisian government will surely hail it as evidence that Tunisia is a tolerant country for its minorities and is fully open once again for foreign tourists.
I taught the rules fast, he got them in a minute, but left Heroic Actions out of the game for simplicity’s sake. However he saw how important initiative was once figures are in charge range and I explained that those special actions mess up with the initiative, creating a new layer of gameplay and planning.
But for those who follow me.. Thank you, and I will always follow you back.
2. Bring subject to the camera. I go inside the camera. (Camera is about the size of a master bathroom in a house; six feet high, by eight feet long, by six feet wide). There is no focusing mechanism on the camera; the lens is simply screwed to a 1″x8″, with a lens hole drilled in it. You focus by simply moving the subject forward and backward. I’m inside the camera, watching Kristin’s face on the plywood “easel”, watching her face come into focus. Her face is projected upside down, like a view camera, so you have to do that thing in your brain where you reverse it in your head. The depth of focus is only about 1/4″; so even a slight movement makes her go out of focus.
"Mommy...go home. Go home!" He announced from the backseat.
Charles Delporte (born in 1928 in Marcinelle, Belgium) is a painter, sculptor, poet and composer. His creative imagination is unlimited.
kigo; kireji; gendai; shasei; juxtaposition and disjunctive methods; and how to make concrete images stand out, and even come across as lyrical in so short a poem, that can also help improve your other writing styles.
I’ve written about Persian food a bit on Off The Broiler in the past, although I consider myself fairly new to it. The ingredients and flavors are exotic and very different from other cuisines in that part of the world, so it’s a real treat when you can find restaurants that do serve it.
Closets organized.
do get yer "girlie card"--or mother's day mojo--on... and come link up with us at SOS this week! in the meantime, be sure to stop over and see what the DT have done, it's worth the trip, i assure you!
Why? Started with a delicate sound of acoustic guitar, this dramatic song is served with a romantically sad lyrics, melancholic voice and a unique concept of the video. The haunting aesthetic and incredibly beautiful sound from the violin make us shiver. The music is just splendidly composed with its forlorn lyrics which somehow eventually transform into a fascinating and uplifting moment. This single doesn’t sound like a track that is released from a debut album, but more like something that musicians with long musical journey bring to their listeners.
It was great fun to spend some time just baking, listening to carols and Christmas songs on the radio and smelling the gorgeous Christmas spices and the biscuits cooking. I had to take a photo of them ready to scrapbook, and took quite a few during the baking process, as I never seem to take many photos at Christmas, so am taking a lot this year as I have a Christmas pad that I am desperate to use :) I also really wanted to fetch out our 50mm lens and crank the aperture to f1.7, I love this shallow depth of field and don't seem to use it enough.
The child’s name is used throughout the book.
You see, that's the way with the Faerie River. It comes and goes as it choosess, answering to no-one and obeying no master or mistress. My personal theory is that it's the primeval memory of the landscape, periodically recreating the days when Husborne Crawley was on the sea bed. It makes me feel very small and yet blessed, somehow.
without swaying and
Answer : The mere use of the word Apartheid combined with the term Human Rights Violations points to liberal ignorance and there is no sense debating a situation with someone from that point of view. There is this tendency that some people suddenly read newspapers and hear about the murders without ever having been interested or involved in politics before, which leads to them coming up with nonsense about so-called Apartheid, a term used abroad only and that did not even appear in the National Party's Manifest. Apartheid is something that never even existed and was nothing but a creation of the foreign media after Dr. Hendrik Verwoerd used the term only twice ever, merely in an explanatory context.
1 arranging
The clouds pulled back once the ferry took to the water. That’s how it seemed. They retreated a little inland and hung there, clumps of knotted lacework, dark at the centre like the shadows of stars, white as cotton at the edges. Hanging there, reluctant to move further out along the estuary, out beyond the peninsula and the islands, out to the unsheltered sea, a net of flickering reflected light on its
The main character! Seth was a subsidiary character in the books I was supposed to be writing – which were contemporary fantasies – but he elbowed his way in and demanded not only equal billing, but a prequel. Brat.
Courtney Love posted on her Twatter account saying Dave Grohl the 43 year-old married father of two former drummer of Nirvana and current lead singer of some band named Foo Fighters hit on her daughter Frances Bean Cobain.
“We will also increase the supply of capital through non-bank lending channels via our £100m SME focused Business Finance Partnership, targeting finance channels other than loan funds.”
We are breathing our holiest prayer.
until I decide what to do with them.
The movie director for the the I AM movie just said that Eunhyuk’s entire trainee days were all about not paying for food
and spread the word.
In addition, patients with medical conditions that make them sensitive to UV rays should also be seen by a healthcare professional before starting phototherapy.
How BEST SLIM works:
I hope to see lots of my blogging buddies over there joining in with the challenges :) We have some great sponsors over there and there is sooo much inspiration from the fab design team.
Cigarettes and alcohol make good nurses. An hour’s vigorous application and Gavroche had the tears and shakes under control. She sat scrunched tight on the motel bed, her fingers kneading the candlewick.
In My Mailbox is hosted by The Story Siren, and is a way for everyone to show their new books for the week, including those bought, swapped, won, or received for review.
1. I am obsessed with cucumbers and salt. I would choose them above just about any other food. When I was little, I called the 'mamoos', I have absolutely no idea why. My friends and family all tease me with this quirky obsession. I can't help but slice up a few cucumbers after work and eat them (and not share, if I can help it!). I also love rice pilaf and "potato items" (as I call them...yes, I am weird) -- french fries, potato chips, mashed potatoes hash browns... Yum!
textures of everyday life. The Trio can sing songs about
with Gold dust at my feet
Once again, international development proves it is the disciple that runs away and not the savior at all.
The party is still going strong and will be open all week,
In honor of our birthday this May, this week's challenge is to create a birthday something. It can be a happy birthday card or a hand made gift for a birthday, or a scrap book layout of a birthday celebration. The only guideline we have is that you create something NEW for this challenge, no back linking to old projects please.
“Careful observation is the only key to true and complete awareness.”
BAMcinématek, Brooklyn's only daily, year-round repertory film program, presents new and rarely seen contemporary films, classics from cinema history, work by local artists and festivals of films from around the world, often with special appearances by directors, actors and other guests. BAMcinématek has not only presented major retrospectives by well-known filmmakers, but has also introduced New York audiences to contemporary artists. BAMcinématek is part of the greater Brooklyn Academy of Music arts community, America's oldest continuously operating performing arts center founded in 1861.
1 tablespoon active dry yeast (Shimrit)
I needed a taller box to put larger images (of my fave Magnolia stamps) and taller trays for the larger Lindt Easter eggs (yum yum). So I have hightened the box 1 1/2 times to 4 1/2 inches high.
Monday September 13th
Well, when my mother moved from a 3-bedroom house to a 1-bedroom apartment, she went ahead and let her children choose from the things she didn't have space to keep. I got the paintings. And I finally got around to getting them re-framed; they are in my living room right now.
for wolf's greatest
Winged creatures
- or – cuz you’re the sweetish fish in the sea!
When he finally got back we assembled the Generator he bought for a price I will not discuss here. ("...Last one in Albany County...")
“THE DOOMSDAY MACHINE”
Below was my entry to the Flashbang writing challenge - 150 word or less crime story. The long list was announced yesterday and I didn't make the last 25. No great surprise - I got hung up on playing with the form (two sections, four paragraphs each, first and last lines echoing) rather than the story.
Possible: Sound Mixing, Sound Editing, Visual Effects; Long Shot: J.J. Abrams (Original Screenplay)
...So I'll just keep hangin on...until, perhaps, I find whatever it is I'm supposed to do next.
Welcome back ! and watch out for the fun stuff beginning this Friday.
I'll leave you with this quote from one of my favorite authors:
S. Siblings: Jay, 29 and Katie, 26
Only the edge of the tornado clipped us. Within an hour, the rain had stopped. With no power, and my cell nearly dead, we had to go out so I could recharge it on the car charger. We followed the devastation to the next town.
I love the warm tone of the wood with the classic colors in his room:
I put on weight due to the Seroquel – yeah, I see you all nodding and tugging at your waist bands. I have no objection from going from 5’10” -130lb to 5’10” – 165/170. The weight sits well on me and part of that is muscle that I started trying to build, control, and maintain once the weight appeared. BUT I do have the older gentleman pot now. What my friend refers to as his ‘food baby’. I don’t like it and I know it is unhealthy (heart,cholesterol,diabetes) so I want it gone – but I’ll settle for a more realistic goal of reduced. The treadmill does do this nicely as long as I use it on a regular enough schedule.
These boxes filled with bits and pieces of this and that have my imagination wondering...how I would love
I think Jenny might be right, it’s not that I’m OCD, I mean I don’t have to switch lights on or off, or never step on cracks (although if I do step on a crack, I try to make my other foot step on crack too, just to even it out), but I’m not obsessive, I just prefer things a certain way. But there are a few things that really bug me:
cutter are actually ideal)
Eng ger Land, Na Na Na. Eng ger Land, Vindaloo. Eng ger Land, Na Na Na. Eng ger Land, Vindaloo. Eng ger Land, Na Na Na. Eng ger Land, Vindaloo. Eng ger Land, Na Na Na. Eng ger Land, Vindaloo. Eng ger Land, Na Na Na. Eng ger Land, Vindaloo. Eng ger Land, Na Na Na. Eng ger Land, Vindaloo.
As the Blast power but it works by exciting the molecules of an object until it explodes in a burst of shrapnel and concussive force. The range is (Smarts x 2)" and it is not considered an attack roll (the burst is automatically centered on the object). This inflicts normal damage (2d6 or 3d6) but affects a Small Burst template by default rather than a Medium Burst and can be increased to a Medium Burst for 2 additional Power Points. The targeted object suffers double damage but magical or metal objects are unaffected. If the targeted object is made of soft or flexible materials then it can be destroyed by the power but not harm anyone else.
how could I forget Caryn and Julie,
a job that will require ten hour days this coming week,
“Zaid is known as a liberal Malay leader. He is popular, especially among the younger generation of voters compared to Kamalanathan, who is just a new leader.
We are like Jacob in that we are not personally present during Christ's ministry. Yet, like Jacob, through our faith we can receive the same blessings. "...salvation is free." All men may come and receive salvation, if they desire it, if they accept it. It is a gift, but God does not force His gift on anyone.
"Put it back, now."
In yesterday’s meeting with my health coach, we were talking about cravings. Sometimes, when you’re craving food, it’s a manifestation of craving for one of life’s primary foods: a stimulating job, a fulfilling relationship, a balanced spiritual and physical exercise habit. I know that for me, as I sit here dreaming of carbs at my office in the auto body shop, there are several things lacking. For one, like many under-30′s today, I have yet to find a satisfying job. More importantly, I am still in a transition period where I’m waiting to create a new home.
But you just can't live in Texas
for reading my ramblings
Former Chief Rabbi of Ireland,
I called up my best friend from a payphone
Understand, if we go on together, it is in my world, The People’s world, and not in this world of Americans who have lost their way.
‘Does George Zimmerman have a job?’
- Serial number; cotton dust cover; certificate card & carebook let ; Louis Vuitton receipt
You make my feet move, you turn my head loose
4. Always Sunny in Philadelphia
It’s not for me to say here, but apparently the guests all spoke very highly of the evening as a whole and felt that the night was something just a little bit special. With some witty banter, Q & A with the brewers a little beer trivia and perhaps a couple of well-timed ‘Dad Gags’, it seems that a ripping night is guaranteed for those who book for future events.
I have read the First Amendment many times. Interestingly enough, nowhere in the Amendment does it include the word “volume.” There is no justifiable reason that one group should be able to shout down the rights of another – or “sing down”, as the case may be.
Have you had the beers above? What did you think? Any other foreign beers that you particularly enjoy?
1. Secondary care doctors must look to their local community. It is naïve to think that a hospital only serves those patients that happen to be in the clinic, or on the wards. Hospitals, if they wish to truly serve the public, which funds them, must look outside their walls, to the community. We cannot sit on the inside of ivory towers complaining about the standard of care given in the community for patients with our particular illness, and do little or nothing to change that care. This is “population medicine” – concern for the wider population, not just the referred population. With limited resources, we need to be sure that specialists are seeing specialist cases, not just whoever happens to turn up. Only through collaboration in networks or systems of care will we achieve this.
Yeah. That's the stuff.
In the depths of her cold heart
The father is nothing if not consistent. Instead of having the elder son bound and brought in to face judgment, he again goes out to meet a rebellious son. And not to command his son, but to plead with him.
I'm still blogging (and I still will be for a few more days) about "i like coffee, i like tea," the theme for this past Thursday's BAKE MY DAY. BMD is a weekly event I started this semester where I bake several vegan desserts and/or breads based on a theme, and invite lots of people over to help eat them. I wanted to try to incorporate the tea into the jam for the scones I was making, so I decided to use darjeeling tea which goes well with apples, ginger and cloves. I used granny smith apples to give a little tartness, but feel free to use a another variety if you prefer. Since I couldn't find a tea jam recipe, I improvised. I used the tea bags at two separate times; I'm not sure if that is necessary but the result was delicious with the perfect amount of darjeeling flavor. Feel free to experiment!
My life is full of crap...but that is not a bad thing. It means every child's digestive system is doing what it is supposed to do. Believe me, having a non-crappy life is much, much worse than a crappy one.
Williams believes if lawmakers allotted money to the low-cost spay/neuter clinics and small rescue organizations, instead of sheltering and euthanizing, we would begin to see a lower population of stray and feral cats in Kentucky, too.
Despite its impressive size – it is spread over two floors – the restaurant is already booked solid for the biggest date in the Christmas party season, December 18.
He dedicated much of his time working in the Veteran’s Service Office, guiding these students through the business processes of SPC and the VA in order to obtain educational benefits and understand the resources available to them. Burris has participated in volunteer events at Bay Pines Veterans Hospital, including nursing home visits and donation drives, as well as serving as a student veteran representative at Sept. 11 commemoration ceremonies in the area.
Yesterday was one of those occasions.
Ephesians 1-6
Good. A little faded at the spine and on to the margins of the wrappers. Leans slightly. Pages gently age tanned.
Remember you do not have to become a follower ....but if you do, it is another added bonus.
Kids like Addison, who got her iPad a couple of weeks ago. Addison's Mom Debbie, who writes Finding Normal, wrote a terrific post about the iPad's arrival already, and she also had this to say of its' arrival.
For me, this is why it's so crucial to organize with the anti-racism working group to build a structural analysis within Occupy NOLA of how we got to this period of advanced capitalism. Luckily, I think we have more resources to draw on for this than in pervious periods. Even before the first GA to plan Occupy NOLA, white anti-racist folks here were reaching out to one another to discuss how to critically engage this moment. Many of us had been moved by the writing coming out of OWS by activists of color on their struggles to build an anti-racist and anti-oppressive politic in New York. Several of us were also encouraged by the conversations happening within the national US for All of US network of white anti-racists about the potential for catalyzing this moment. Others of us were calling on our knowledge gained from our participation, both as local New Orleanians and outside volunteers, in anti-racist organizing at Common Relief following the storm. Looking around the space of Occupy NOLA, instead of feeling lost and overwhelmed as I have so many times before in these spaces, I felt hopeful and inspired.
I’ve been back home for a week now and have been thinking a lot about my fantastic trip. There were so many special memories made that it is impossible to list all of the “bests.” The Italy “bests” have already been posted and now it is time to turn to Spain and Morocco. On our last couple of nights in Madrid, Janel and I put our heads together and came up with a list of our favs. We decided to combine both places for this list.Once again, the “Worst” list is very short – a sign of a great trip!
Thanks to Stacy and Kimberly for being here today!
Public Transport: Nearest Tube: Liverpool Street / Aldgate East. Bus Routes: N8, N25, N11, N26, N35, N149, N214, N253, 8, 35 and 149
“Oh my, you have your hands full.”
I don't see anything about the Breeders on that blurb, but according to their website, they'll be playing a free show in Waterloo park. (It's in the European tour section). I wonder if it's a non-SXSW event or if they've moved the free shows back from Auditorium shores.
990 **D-X/22/1987. “Human Nature and The Federalist: Hopes and Fears at the Founding.” The Federalist Papers Today Lecture Series, DePaul University, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1991(2), above, pp. 1042-53.)
“They are coming from an organization that creates a culture of fear and intimidation,” Mr. Webster said. “Those in command use their authority to intimidate others and discourage them from speaking out. It’s all part of the para-militaristic hierarchy that exists. That’s why so few step outside the group and criticize those in authority."
Blurb --
Treatment of Fuji Z1 is fairly easy to use. There, the five scene modes, program mode, and quite inappropriately named in manual mode. This is the last one really only the progeam mode again, but it allows you to bypass the white balance, exposure, set, and change the AF mode.
When I ordered another JSK later on from QutieLand (Milky Planet Replica in Yellow from DOL), I wrote them in order to understand better what happened. They are always really nice when they answer my emails, here is a part of their answer " ...we cannot tell the reason of easy to get issue on the bust size. But we may assumed that will relate to your height and the lower bust size as well. The original dress cutting may not fit properly according to your body scale. "
After enjoying a mojito, a bowl of gumbo with cornbread and a hot spicily dressed salad, I was ready to go for the ride Trisha suggested in her new car with a moon roof. She drove, I navigated and Em took pictures, giggling to herself in the back seat. The first goal was to share a siting of the Woman in White, who I have never seen when anyone was with me. A figment? A spirit? A sprite? True to form, she didn't show for us. Em was ready with her camera, just in case.
I'm just not ready. I'm not ready for you to be old enough to go to school. I'm not ready for you to need a lunch, or a backpack, or to have projects at school. Aren't you 2 years old? don't you need me to change your diaper? Don't you need me to sing you to sleep?
Anyway, I'll be back again soon.
7/10
Before I have a baby, I was not sure if I will be able to have mom friends around here since I didn't know many people but I found wonderful mom friends. And our kids are about same age so we can always talk about their growth and help each other with what we know. I am so thankful that I met these ladies. I hope we can keep our friendship and watch our kids grow together!
You discover the Rake Back or you want to improve your revenues? Here are a few tricks and tips to optimize your earnings:
Screenings: You are expected to attend all screenings, even if you’ve seen the film before, and to watch them actively and closely. Refrain from using laptops and cellphones during screenings. WARNING: We will be watching films in this class that contain graphic violence, nudity, and adult themes. If you think this content will offend or disturb you, you should reconsider your enrollment in this class.
I think it's probably that the myth of the Summer of Love and the hype has created the Haight more than anything else, but I thought you'd like to accompany me on my little tour...
My crush for the first half of the 80's was Simon Le Bon. Granted, he wasn't the most handsome of the fab(ish) four, but he sang the songs and he wrote the lyrics. He was a poet. Cue swooning. In 1985, the last year of my Duran Duran crush, I made my dad buy me a fedora. I begged my mother to let me highlight my hair until I wore the woman down. I stuck the hat on my red-frost-highlighted head, slapped on some glittery pink lipstick and pouted in a way I thought was attractive. I know now that I looked like I had toothache, but it was a gateway to daydreams.
Most parents enter their twilight years and decide they are going to write a biography of their life to leave for their children. Not my mother. My mother has told me that she’s leaving me a medical journal of sorts. She’s completing a handwritten diary of her aches and pains, “so that I’ll know what sort of hell awaits me.”
There’s a lot going on in A Brush of Darkness. Abby’s a fun protagonist. She’s got a lot of spunk and sadness, which seems like an odd combination but really works in the book. Her baggage is pretty serious–dead mom, nightmares of her death, locked in a contract with a Fae that she doesn’t really understand–but she takes her obligations seriously and does her best, even when the Fae she’s contracted with disappears, leaving Abby with a magical marketplace to run. Abby gets points for pluck in the face of her own ignorance, an ignorance that would be a huge issue for me if it wasn’t already a big problem for her. I like that she realizes she’s out of her depth and that she wants to get her sh*t straightened out.
Here's the track listing so you know what's on the Christmas menu.
while I return to your eyes, where I saw those gems
it completely over to her. I am excited to see her totally run with it!
I can do infinite mental trips, when I'm sad. I've a whole alternative happy world in my mind.
The unions will announce on Tuesday whether they will accept the State’s salary increase offer of 7% and a housing allowance of R700 per month.
Last Friday's queues were waiting for their first chance to get their hands on new $200 million and $500 million notes – and to access a new weekly withdrawal limit worth $500 million, rather than $100 million.
One of the striking impressions I get from my dealings with language learning, language use and multilingualism is our tendency to look at what is not there. I don’t mean the commendable mindset that urges us to keep doing more and better because we know that we haven’t done our most and best yet, I mean the way we tend to disregard what is there.
August will see me play a series of practical hedgehog-centric jokes on my showbiz friends. For example, I intend to leave Ralph in Fern Britton’s salad bag. Note to self: Danger of suffocation so I must make holes. Another note to self: does Fern even have a salad bag? Yet another note to self: Judy says she does but it’s technically a plastic bucket and usually contains spiced meat.
“When can I see you again?” he asked.
I know a whole family who operates like this. They blame and shame and tear down but never stop to see the hideousness of their own behavior. The son held a grudge towards his parents for favoring his little sister, something he felt set him up for a life of failures. This lead to several, years long, estrangements between him and his parents. They’d say something he didn’t like, and he’s cease all contact with them for years. I simply could not “get it” until I spoke to his parents during one of these estrangement periods. His parents told me stories of his lifelong habit of lying, his inability to keep a job, and about the time, when he was 19 or 20, when he came home from work late at night and woke his father up several times in a row, so they told him to move out. That had happened 25 years prior! Yes, I did have an “aha moment” about the son’s behavior at that point. It had been modeled for him all of his life. I have seven kids and I have been awakened more than once by one coming home late at night. My response was always, “Thank you,God! They are home and safe.” Then I went back to sleep. Sadly, narcissists do not learn to forgive, and let go, and move on, nor do they want to learn.
I love having it all in one handy reference. Veteran fermenters will appreciate Wardeh's clear, simple, explanations, tips, and instructions, while "newbies" will find thewhole process much less intimidating.
I threw my head back to find us traveling beneath those wind turbines we'd until now, just viewed from a distance, their blades cutting purposefully through that hazy desert sunlight.
In the sun.
*”It’s all fallen on me.” “As has Jaime repeatedly, according to Stannis Baratheon.”
Do you trust what you’re eating?
The river bears no empty bottles, sandwich papers,
The camera was a C725 on it’s macro setting w/ two addl lenses.
I made a few just for fun. I wrapped them up and told Jennifer, the bride, I made some new samples for her cookie wedding favors. My family and I are kinda nutty and we like to laugh and kid each other, but you knew that about me already didn't you?
Aye me. Why can't I just meet someone who is so into me that he sweeps me off my feet? And it would be nice if said Lancelot would ravish me long before I lose consciousness watching his hands click his mouse or hold his cellular phone. I mean, yes, Guinevere did a lot of fainting, but I always figured that was just the corsets.
In several cases “the victim ceased cooperating with the military justice proceeding and the subjects were given no judicial punishment for consensual sodomy.”
As a junior, I know all about searching for that senior summer internship that will help your resume when you start applying for jobs. However, sometimes finding a smaller company can be just the right thing for you.
“Yeah, they’ll roar and flap their wings noisily at night.” Nadia shifted her weight.
My Saviour wept that all tears might be wiped from my eyes,
First morning, discovered I had made a real mess of the packing and
Are you lonely in a way that language can’t allay
One examiner told teachers how to “hammer exam technique” rather than teach the entire subject curriculum, adding: “We’re cheating… Probably the regulator will tell us off.”
Ann Curry asked her if she was going to have more children. She said that the octuplets were a sign from God to stop. After 14 children she needs a sign from God to stop. That is mental illness. And why weren’t her tubes tied when they were in there?
Narrow Gauge has many satisfied clients, but don’t take our word for it. Check out our references . We also have a lot of useful information and links to help you plan your event. So spend a few minutes on our site and check it all out.
Though a future together is impossible, the warrior’s touch ignites an irresistible passion in Jessa. But every heated kiss pushes them closer to destruction. Forced to return to the brutality of his Viking past to protect her, will Broder surrender forever to his darkest impulses
I know when baby #2 comes it may be a lot harder for us to keep doing weekly dates. I doubt sitting in a restaurant with two kids is as easy and relaxing as sitting there with one! Our routine may change to two dates a month (with no kids) and one "family date". Or maybe one date out at a restaurant (no kids) one "family date out at a restaurant and one "at home" date.
fist clenched, red-blooded american male
Before I entered, I saw the family sitting around the living room table, talking in their loud and jovial manner, like every year, while on the couches and arm chairs some individuals fell asleep, eating to their guts content. Shaking off the precipitation and dirt, I removed my coat and shoes and walked to the sink. Throwing the plates in, Sue followed suit. I sat with the sleeping giants and looked around.
Already during fertilization, biological processes begin which influence sex and gender (MacLaughlin & Donahoe, 2004). Usually an X or a Y chromosome-bearing sperm fertilizes the X-bearing egg. Initially, primitive gonadal tissue, visibly identical in males and females, forms adjacent to the rudimentary kidneys. Influenced by genes and hormones, particularly towards the beginning of the second trimester, the gonadal tissue and other related structures differentiate and migrate, forming ovaries, oviducts, the uterus and upper region of the vagina in females, to merge with the forming external genitalia of clitoris, an independent urethra, labia, and the lower vagina.
If you start watching this video every day...
When the police arrived at the spot, the agitators ransacked their vehicle and pelted stones at them. Following this, the policemen lathicharged the people and fired tear gas shells, sources said, adding 16 policemen were injured in brickbatting.
Turkey Cheese Roll Up
The flowers were mesmerizing to watch as they spiraled down to fall to earth from high above in the tree. “
As the world is striding forward in advocating higher level of democracy and human rights; it is indeed a woeful fact that our beloved country is still getting stuck in the rut, entrenching its authoritarian regime and even heightening its suppress over people’s freedom and social forces.
So after all that awesomeness why am I up in the air? Well it's simply this...once your mind is stretched in new directions it never regains it's former shape; now I have to DO something with what I've experienced and learned or else it will wither, die and be for nought and I won't let that happen.
In this installment of the Vimes saga, the commander is being dragged from the city to his wife’s ancestral home, ostensibly for a forced vacation. He has barely adjusted to the absence of city noise when a goblin girl is murdered and it becomes apparent that the countryside is rife with intrigue and evil-doing. Vimes solves the case with help from a goblin, a local policeman, a bartender, and his trusty valet, Willikins, a handy man with a cross-bow and brass knuckles.
Ramsey Kanaan was involved in the early UK anarcho‐punk musical scene of the 1970s and 1980s, yet is best known as the founder of AK Press, one of the largest distributors of anarchist and left‐wing books in the world. In 2007 Kanaan left AK Press to establish PM Press, a new radical publishing outfit.
Vitale goes on to say: "For the person who wants to simply try to reproduce their favorite beer at home, or the enthusiast who wants to make a high-quality beer of their own, the state shouldn't treat them as it would a commercial brewery. It's about time we clear out this unnecessary and unenforced permit requirement from the books, and lift the scofflaw status from thousands of residents who simply want to lift a pint of their own creation without fear that the state's peering over their shoulder."
El Menzah V,
This weekend, the Hamilton Drama Dept will be presenting Any Number Can Die. It is a spoof of the mystery plays of the late twenties and is complete with sliding panels, wills being read at midnight, unexpected guests, hooting owls, and several murders. Of course you need the raging storm on the remote island off the coast of North Carolina that cause the lights to go off and on, the cryptic poem about the missing fortune, and the creepy figure in black.
I can’t even begin to explain to you how we felt that day. We woke up around 5 am, tired, not wanting to get up and deal with the cold and the crowd, but we knew if we didnt go, we’d be soooo mad at ourselves. And so we got up. And we walked from Howard to U Street to meet the rest of the crew (for those who’ve never been to DC, it was about 10 city blocks up from my sister’s dorm). We passed by the famed Ben’s Chili Bowl and took pictures in front of their colorful ice sculpture that read, “OBAMA.” Being that close to Ben’s hit me for a second because of a sad connection I have with the place, but the joy of the day took over and we were back on our way.
Total = 19.5
Coffee is a greeting, and a rough one at that. It gruffly says “hello” before slapping you across the face and telling you get on with it. It doesn’t allow you to wallow in lethargy or self pity. It gooses you from your seat and tilts your house on end, spilling you out the door, on to the street, and on toward destiny. It braces you for what awaits, be it victory or death. It sharpens the wits and tautens the sinew. Be there a fort involved, coffee readies you to storm it.
just come back next to me, come back to me
1. Shirt (Zara)
How to stick your foot in it 101. Rambling on in front of your 2nd year French engineering students, "Yeah, one of your classmates came to English Night. He was the only one there, so he was stuck with us. Poor guy. But I don't think we scared him off, he said he's coming back... blah blah blah." 10 minutes later, you pick up sign in sheet and see said student's name on it (he was supposed to be Jane's student) and then look directly up at him. Oops.
And the values of wellness being fully felt,
The SatNav stays glued to my windscreen when I return.
I estimate that on average my garden gets about 3.5 hours of direct sunlight per day. Fortunately, this direct light falls in the midday period. My garden then spends several hours in dappled shade during the afternoon. All in all, a fairly good set of circumstances for a shady garden.
I go out shopping with my mom and ask her if it would be possible for dad to front me the cash and I'd pay them in the 5 easy installments like QVC would allot me. That seems reasonable right? She says to ask my father, but then by the third time I brought it up she was getting annoyed and kind of let it slip that I may or may not have one already on hold for my birthday. (Coming up in May just in case any of you want to buy me something).
Rule no 5 :Use of Cucumber
What do I mean by that? Study. Marry. Have kids. Be ambitious. Strive to have LOTS AND LOTS OF MONEY. Sacrifice yourself. Don’t think for yourself – listen to those wiser than you. Strive to be powerful (in an external way).
This little side effect I have has been a joke in the family. A couple of Halloween’s ago, I was at my sister’s house and we had just got done doing the whole trick-or-treating thing. We walked out the door to leave and me being completely stupid did not notice when my husband opened the door that my nieces husband was hiding in the back seat with a mask on. I was laughing and joking with the family and jumped in the car. No one else got in. I wondered for a split second what was taking them so long. I looked out my window and then turned to look at the driver side door to see where my husband was, when I came face to face with “The Mask”. I screamed a blood curdling scream, leapt out of the car nearly slamming the nephew in the door. This nearly killed me. I cannot begin to tell you had long after this incident I shook. The closest thing to a near death experience he and I may ever experience.
The prefect came out dressed to the nines in his military uniform and after a short informative video about being French (the only thing I found odd is that they tell you what it means to be French after you've been naturalized! what if you change your mind???) Then he gave a short speech and the European anthem was played. Afterwards we were invited to join him in singing la Marseillaise. When Mystery Guest asked if I knew all the words (we were given a photocopy of the lyrics just in case!) I said of course not, I know the few key lines but that's it - not that that's a bad thing don't ask me to sing the whole Star Spangled Banner off the top of my head either! (I'll always have a soft spot for the American national anthem, it's just so poetic and not so bloody...)
What can we give? Or how much does it cost? It cost the life of Jesus and there is nothing you can give to obtain the mercy of God. But once you have the Holy Spirit dwelling in you, you will be moved to give everything freely…
People all around me started weeping into tissues and handkerchiefs and I quickly joined in. My heart broke thinking of how we wounded Him with our cruelty and our ignorance and our apathy. It made me feel so ashamed.
What once was known and loved as true
Two of the books that I published out to Apple (through Smashwords) for Steel Magnolia Press got some lovely placement last week just before Apple announced most of their crew would be off for the holidays. While the bestseller lists are automated, the other lists seem to be manually overseen. So at one of the busiest times for ebook buying, these books have prime placement with the potential that they'll keep that placement through the first of the year.
After more than half a century of independence we still cling on to the notion that an inclusive national narrative can come about through not one, but several vernacular education systems. Nowhere else in the world (or the developed world at least) can I think of an example of such an arrangement, where both the government and the opposition seem inclined to support the popular demand for vernacular-based education streaming.
· Resolves escalated and complex issues in one or more specific process areas which include:
I think young Bâri′ went to Indonesia with President Sukarno himself. Perhaps late in April 1961, at age one and one-half, when Sukarno visted President John F. Kennedy in Washington D.C.:
Young Mister Morton, for those of y'all who may not know, is the entrepreneurial scion of restaurateur and Hard Rock Café co-founder Peter Morton and he clearly wants to put his own, permanent mark on the Los Angeles drinking and dining scene. He currently owns the venerable Sunset Strip music venue The Viper Room (where poor River Phoenix met his early on the sidewalk out front in 1989), the fairly new Fukuburger Hollywood in the heart of Hollywood, and the naughty-naughty-named Pink Taco, a boozy, Mexican food eatery and pick-up bar in the Westfield Century City Mall. Once upon a time there were several Pink Taco establishments, including in Nevada and Arizona, but only the Century City location remains operational.
Direct the winds of passion to your goal
The trouble with ripping people off is you never can tell who they are, how often they would have returned or how many friends they will tell to avoid the place. That is perhaps why this place was almost empty and El Federal was full.
& irks me every week
I started shopping with you when you built a store near the track. How convenient, to be able to buy groceries when I got there instead of carting them from home! Then, when I moved up to the area, that store was the closest, and it was familiar to me, so it became my default.
(sigh) cant find my own profile with email address so here it is lol....stitcheranon@yahoo.co.uk
One side of the wing is done first and ends by joining it to the body. But, that would leave me with a problem of where to hide the two ends because there isn't a suitable place where I can sew then in. I prefer to sew in the ends because the other methods don't seem to work for me, except for the SSSR where suitable. In this case, I am going to undo that chain and do it up again as a split chain coming form the body and ending at the join at the top of the ring where I have more choices of places to hide the ends.
Will you ask God to make you available for Him to use you? How in your daily responsibilities can you be used to lead others in advancing God's work? What unlikely source or person may God be using in your life to lead you? Do you have a boss who treats you unfairly? Is there a new Christian who you think you are meant to disciple, when in fact God would use them to remind you of your first love? What seemingly insignificant person has God purposely sent to meet you? Will you ask God to make you aware of how He is working around you, whether he is bringing someone into your life to show you His plan, or whether you are meant to lead that person closer to God's plan for them?
Today should be her birthday. I wish I could call her and tell het Happy Birthday and tell her how much I love her. Even though she is not here I am going to celebrate her life anyway and I’m going to focus on how much her life meant to me and how much better my life is now because she was once a part of it.
*Monday evening*
Everything you could possibly want to know about Assistant is after the break…
Stay tuned for surfers and scenic views! Hope you all have an awesome day.
Do you strive to live a pure and holy life? What disciplines help you do that?
Anyway, here’s the Blurb:
I still don’t have any friends among my peers but I do conversate with them more. The thing is I wanna say this had a happy ending but it doesn’t. I will never be the same after all they did. I am still paranoid after hearing even friends talk about me behind my back, after hearing people lie to me. I just now finished my freshman year of High school. I know their still 3 years I got. I contemplated suicide at 8! No child should even have to fathom ending it. I would come home crying and tell my mom. She just told me to beat them up. But I couldn’t. I’m not that person. I can only be aggressive towards people I’m close with. I help people who hurt me. You threaten me and I’ll help you with your homework. That’s me.
gently down the Nile;
What about you? Has this experience ever happened for you?
This is why I will be voting in People Magazine's Reader's Choice Hero contest for Andrea Roberts. She has created an organization called Reece's Rainbow, named after her son with DS, to help these children from around the world find their forever families through adoption. Over 300 children are growing up loved, healthy, and happy because of Andrea's work.
Cardamom Chicken Stew
1 resolve
So here are a few of my picks for the Liebster....
The taste is nothing special. It’s a typical mass-market lager with nothing much to distinguish it from hundreds of others. Still, it’s not bad. I can still find a way to enjoy it.
Relaxes into mother-wit.
Year: 2004
Hard to believe it is MAY!!!! Happy MAY Day eveyone...What happened to dancing around the May Pole? I guess too many people stopped believing in the old traditions.
At six o’clock sharp she clapped her hands and said, “Time for good little girls to scrub up for dinnertime!” When Mommy spoke now her voice was high-pitched and reedy, a few octaves above her old speaking voice.
Adrien peeled himself off the wall and stood next to him.
And what a sweet little life it is. I hope I never forget all the things that made your first birthday so special. Like how cute you were in your tu-tu giving away all your sweet smiles...smiles that literally make my heart melt. I seriously feel closer to heaven when you smile. And giving away kisses to everyone you were being passed around to...and smiling and patty-caking while everyone clapped and took pictures while you were getting into your cake. It was like serious paparazzi while you were eating your cake..flashes going off everywhere!! And you were such a trooper staying up until 10:30 because, well the party was so good it kept going!
3.) Mountain - Mississippi Queen - The Great Fatsby's finest hour.
Congratulations Jess! Just pop me an email over with your contact info and your prize will be on its way!
It was pretty easy to print on the linen provided it was taped securely around the edges of a piece of card stock. I tried the freezer paper method with no luck as the fabric got stuck in my printer. I wrapped the tape around the edges and to the back of the paper. I also found it necessary to tape along all of the edges otherwise the fabric moved around and the image wasn't straight.
The angle in which his little fist struck the mug sends scalding coffee UP MY NOSE, all over my face, on my PJs (that I was hoping to keep clean so I could justify wearing them to the bus stop in 28 seconds when his bus rounds the bend), all over the leather couch, the off-white rug....you get the picture.
ferns
1/4-1/2lb cheese of your choice(I'm using provolone)
I'd love it if you'd all take a look at it, not just to see the gifts available, but to let me know WHAT you all want to see. Think I need more magnets? Should I have different products for sale? Let me know, I want to hear what my customers/fans want so I can make it for them.
Look at these little kittens. There are actually four of them. An orange one is not in the picture. Aren't they cute? Do not let their cute faces gets to you, they are really a nuisance to my garden! I do like cats, when I was young, our family had a cat, a dog, a guinea pig, 2 ducks and a chicken as our pets!
Malaysians have come to the political crossroad. Our country is rich with natural resources, yet we are heading towards national economic melt-down.
Set up and break down intervention settings.
Thursday night the seven of us sat down to make our own ornaments. In years past, we head out to the hobby store to find an ornament that represents us for that given year. Well, we decided to head into nature to find some items that we could make an ornament out of this year. The family loved this activity! I loved that Daddy thought it up and led the "hike" and crafting part!
Cornbread dressing flavored with fresh sage, thyme, leeks and prosciutto and made with homemade cornbread, a loaf of oatmeal bread and a small loaf of sour dough.
SAINT ETIENNE – CARNT SLEEP (BETA)
Caprylic Triglyceride – See Caprylic Acid.
Stephan Maas percussion
We are there when they need us, then they are gone when we need them.
Information on the advertisement for both applications is as follows :
Neil Young – “Godfather of Grunge”
Once you sign up you will receive a welcome email including a 15% off code. This is valid for up to 9 people so if you need to buy multiple tickets this could work out to significant savings right there. You will also receive one Maple Leaf Lounge invitation where you can enjoy complimentary drinks, snacks, Wifi and a nice quiet environment compared to the rest of the airport before your flight.
Once you have your account, you can start tweeting by typing something (up to 140 characters) in the box at the top of the page, then click “Tweet” to send it. This will show up on your followers’ pages, and anyone who visits your profile will be able to see your tweets. This is kind of like a status update on Facebook--let your followers know what you’re doing, mention a book you just read, ask a question, etc.
Though the Macross 30th Anniversary Exhibition has been on since April 27th, the prized exhibition piece is this 1/1 scale model of the iconic transformable Valkyrie Fighter Jet—more precisely the VF-25F from Macross Frontier.
Reply 5
Last night I went to bed with a million thoughts floating around in my head and woke up the same way, almost dreading the coming day. Days like this I like to give myself a little time to do what I want to do before any responsibilities take over. I emailed with a few friends and then Alexander, Izzy, and I headed over to the commons area in our neighborhood to do some sprints. I obviously couldn't keep up with Alexander and was either being pushed to run harder by Izzy or she was jumping on me as I ran. I am sure the neighbors had a good laugh over our workout this morning.
Publicly funded as all this may be, and in perhaps the UK's biggest planned town to boot, there's a striking lack of coherence to all this, bar the optimistic chasing of 'creativity'. To find something that is coherent, go to the private sector new town of Billingham, the town ICI built, a chemicopolis whose planned 60s centre, by local architects Elder, Lester & Partners, is striking. It's the space-age coated in pigeon shit, with some fabulous buildings, such as the Lubetkinesque towers of Kennedy Gardens (whose patterning is the barcode façade avant la lettre). From the elevated part you can survey the surviving ICI skyline; from the ground floor a functioning, if elderly civic modernism. One part, the Forum, is Grade II listed, but a redevelopment has given it the tackiest of blue and yellow re-claddings, raising once again, after Park Hill, the question of whether there's even any point listing 1960s buildings.
Sadly, in 2007, Corporate Josh was taken away from the world. In what witnesses recounted as a terrible accident involving a chainsaw and a bear, tragedy struck and all but destroyed any hope of the band getting back together. Nwahs was left to consider possibly giving his one man band Disorderly Cows another go, but most of his attention was focused on Hairy Cherry, his punk band that did Mariah Carey covers. But today is a new day. Cancer must be eradicated, Tilex must be fought, and Soapscum must prevail. Nwhas has enlisted the help of a couple VERY noteworthy but anonymous musicians from various metal bands (rumor has it that Robert Parker the Tennessee guitar virtuoso is among them). “We’ll never be able to relicate Josh’s creative aspects, but all we can do it try. All we can say is Fuck Cancer and Fuck Tilex!”
Phil Ehart: drums
Rossendale Radio stopped broadcasting last month and now Ofcom has ruled that it failed to meet the requirements of its license.
The Bitch has been tagged, memed, and last week when it first happened she didn't even know what it meant.
Mr Taylor’s Mum, Mrs Taylor, was enthusiastic about her son’s project:
hw: don't know
Anyway according to Professor Russell, this plank in that idolatry-of-progress platform is factually false.
This video exposes men provoking an arrest, the magazine presents this as something noble.
There are delicious juicy apples to be gathered - Gala, and Golden Delicious and Cox. Our B&B guests are still enjoying fresh apple juice for breakfast - one of the most popular things about the Head Chef's most excellent breakfasts.
"You know what? The thing is that nobody writes unless they have to. So if you have to write because it's inside you, then you will."
I remember looking into the night sky during a car ride home and asking Rick if he could believe that the Lord who created the heavens also created us. And Rick replied that the amazing thing wasn’t the stars He created but rather that He created us to enjoy them. We are His pride and joy. He created us for His own delight. I am grateful.
According to Cuba’s MINREX, only ten diplomats are assigned to its Embassy in Nicaragua.
Sniff Seattle Dog Walker Requirements:
tiny hole punch for the small berries on the wreath
On the ground floor of our shop - this blue cupboard is filled with our new pasta server and bowls which come in all our patterns.
Peramma makes the most awesome sauce fish fry (esp.Sardines/Mathi/Chala)! She had this little pan, maybe a 6 inch fry pan which had some dents and no handle. She used that only for fish fry and I used to tell her I wanted that pan when she was planning to throw it away because I believed that that pan gave the fish fry some extra taste. I think and still thinks, it did!
Finally, it was time to go "home" to our hotel room so that we could play some more. Tonight he insisted that we would make love to his music so that when he was at the gym or in the car and he listened to his playlist he could recall this evening. We chatted about dancing and how we haven't had the opportunity to go out dancing together. We have seen plays, shared gourmet dinners, drunk too much at bars but no dancing as of yet. He claimed to be a good dancer and I put him to task. Music maestro ...
Landing snatched the thought away from him, as he stretched his feet down towards the weathervane on the Tower of Birds. Boots struck iron, wings became arms, and swoop became fall. He tumbled down the sharply-sloping tiles and caught the edge. His head chose that moment to throb, and he dropped to the walkway with enough force to drive him to his knees.
-The $50 prize must be approved by the Environmental Stewardship and Sustainability office, and spent on campus due to budget numbers
“We know that anyone born of God does not continue to sin; the one who was born of God keeps him safe, and the evil one cannot harm him.We know that we are children of God, and that the whole world is under the control of the evil one.We know also that the Son of God has come and has given us understanding, so that we may know him who is true. And we are in him who is true—even in his Son Jesus Christ. He is the true God and eternal life. Dear children, keep yourselves from idols.” - 1 John 5:19-21
The Orange Wave Band Boosters will host a reception following the concert.
8. Are you currently working on another novel? A sequel to Della Says: OMG! perhaps?
Ahem… We are not dead! Well, the horse is, but she is here, nevertheless, as we all know by now!
Breathing in the morning air
Not that any rational person can be opposed to millionaires paying their fair share.
And, after seeing maybe three dozen Holocaust-related films through the DC JCC in the last two years, I know more than ever that Urban Outfitters did something really dirty. So what’s a good punishment? Forget a fine. I think the marketing and sales team that came up with the idea should be fired and kicked out on the sidewalk naked…no matter how many tees the stores sold or how much free PR they generated. Or maybe they should be forced to wear the same t-shirt for four years straight everywhere they go, without washing it.
Ok, prepare yourselves for a bit of a rant...
Come to think of it, from all that we have heard about Palin, the description seems quite believable. Inasmuch as Levi was sleeping and having a having a baby with the abstinence-only preaching daughter Bristol Palin at the same time, suffice to say that there must have been a lot of sexual tension in Chez Palin.
But, I wasn't there for the awards ceremony.
Driving home I thought this new big retail attitude was going to be the salvation of Mom and Pop stores.
And finally, the last example was their newer Devil's Pocket cupcakes made with Yeungling Porter. Apparently the name is the nickname for the area around where her store is located. The saying goes that it used to be pretty dangerous and even the Devil would get his pocket picked there. Pretty sure it's safer now though! The cupcakes were pretty tasty too so totally worth visiting the area for one.
Doctor McKnight goes on to trace the early progression from the 1 Corinthians 15 gospel statement to the early Rule of Faith (very early, very brief credal statements) to the Apostles’ and Nicene Creeds. Using a transitive property of sorts, he concludes that “the Nicene Creed is preeminently a gospel statement” (64). This is flawed thinking, unfortunately. It is the same logic, applied in reverse, that McKnight had used to bemoan our own “salvation culture,” that just because a salvation message flowed from the gospel does not mean that they are equivalent.
that I can breathe.
didn’t show you the inside of my closet. I have this odd inability to close my drawers so I constantly have clothes bursting out all over the place. I’m also guilty of leaving clothes all over the floors, chairs, tables and the bathroom. Oy now I’m just embarrassed.
It was at this point they told us that we were accepted. We could go ahead with treatment. Music to my ears. I was so happy and excited! This chapter in our life is really beginning. I do not know if in the end this will bring us our baby (I hope it does) but it will take us on new adventure and remind us that this journey doesn't stop and we are moving forward with our dream to be parents!
I like V’s story, I wasn’t happy how things went down with Jane. The book ended I let it go, I thought we were done with all of that poor me crap. Never heard anything was wrong with the happy couple in any of the other books, but then bam, looks like they aren’t so happy and V has regressed into his fun side. I liked showing the couple struggling, but I felt like it was out of character or a step way back in the wrong direction. I thought he worked through all Bloodletter stuff. Then Warden complicates things by bring Butch in the mix. I’m sorry, sure Jane is beyond understanding but Marissa side steps too?
09 The Night
Today's giveaway is one of my favorite products, Sticky Tape.
2 effectively
Do you even see your selfishness? Your egomania?
He would come, sit, sit up, lie down and roll over, shake hands and stay on command.
I’ve also made peace with shadowboxing. You know, whatever it takes to warm up and get the boxing gloves on.
With so many residents especially the cardiologist bismarck north dakota are forced to leave their native land and move to other neighboring states. The population of the cardiologist bismarck north dakota to meet with other single people. North Dakota refinance loans is 5.76 percent. A week from now, it could be close to the cardiologist bismarck north dakota. The 1/4 mile high banked dirt oval track is one of North Dakota's economy which, in turn, will help you sort out the cardiologist bismarck north dakota between coverage and cost-then do some shopping on your own. This means that your chosen school has been done. If you need to shop around and compare quotes by going to run you between $130,000 and $200,000 depending on the cardiologist bismarck north dakota by professional searchers before putting their own sets of rules and regulations when it comes time to choose a North Dakota requires massage therapists to be thoroughly qualified for a successful career in massage therapy, and this is an emerging field and there are ways in which North Dakota can provide yourself with extra money each month for family health insurance in ND. Group healthcare insurance in North Dakota. With 4,385 acres of land, the cardiologist bismarck north dakota in North Dakota massage therapy schools.
A major problem of modern economies is the way money is introduced into the economy through bank debt. This gives immense power to banks and requires that the economic system operate on the basis of debt. If levels of debt decline the amount of money available for commercial transactions decreases and economic life is stunted. There needs to be enough money to keep the economy moving. In a country such as South Africa a large proportion of the population is unemployed and too poor to obtain and afford bank loans. In rich and developed countries dole money is paid to the unemployed. This is not feasible under current economic circumstances in South Africa. The unemployed therefore remain cashless and can only become active in the formal economy by the introduction of a basic (citizen's) income or by an effective process of monetary reform such as has been suggested by Huber and Robertson (2000). They detail a process in which money generation is transferred from the banking system to a monetary authority independent of government control. The amount of money created is carefully monitored so as not to cause inflation or major disruptions to economic life and is spent into the economy through public works, a basic income or some other suitable mode of government spending.
his arms up in disgust. Exasperated, the young farm boy jumps into
“There are many foolish people in the world and when a man in a rather high position puts on no frills, slaps them on the back, and tells them he’ll do anything in the world for them, they are very likely to think him clever.”
On the fifth of November, we attended another local spectacle - the Sticklepath Fireshow - a yearly performance of puppet-ghouls and papier-mâché skellingtons in front of an audience of thousands.
In case you haven't seen this film today, you need to take 10 minutes and watch it. If it doesn't make you happy, you have a stone cold heart.
We will announce this later.
I: Was there any interest in turning Essential Logic into a band that would have a Krishna Conscious message?
But clearly, If I've taken the trouble to design a recipe with a certain gravity/hop ratio I should have bothered. Especially if I want a competition winning beer.
Step 5. Fill in the pumpkin with thinned orange.
Jalousie is the most opaque out of the 6. It has no shimmers but is a lovely berry fuchsia. I like this shade the most since I haven't seen very many opaque glossimers from Chanel lately.
Deepak feels that scientific explanations are sterile and reductive, diminishing humankind to a mere collection of atoms, no different in kind from any other object in the universe. But scientific knowledge does not diminish our humanity any more than the knowledge that our country is one among many diminishes our appreciation of our native culture. In fact, the opposite is closer to the truth. Emotion, intuition, adherence to authority—traits that drive the belief in religious and mystical explanation—are traits that can be found in other primates and even in lower animals. But orangutans cannot reason about the angles in triangles, and macaque monkeys do not look to the heavens and wonder why the planets follow elliptical paths. It is only humans who can engage in the wondrous processes of reason and thought called science, only humans who can understand themselves and how their planet got here, and only humans who could discover the atoms that form us.
Thanks for the warm response to Wednesday night's post. My apologies this one is late.
This weekend was truly one big experiement. You see, Emerson has been acting out lately in her own way. She is definitely not acting out as horribly as some toddlers do but lets keep in mind that she is a very well behaved child who really likes to follow the rules (aka brown noser). So, when she has been blatantly yelling at mommy and daddy and telling us "no", that is some serious acting out for her. I just naturally assumed that it stemmed from being jealous of Ashton. This weekend proved that wrong.
Residences
Elsewhere private rents rose by 0.2% in the month of January 2012and over the past year, such rents are up by 3.1%. It seems that in our financial crisis, the big correction in rent took place in 2009 with a 19% maximum decline, compared to a decline of just 1.4% for all of 2010. Since the start of 2011 there has been a 3.0% increase (mostly recorded in February and October 2011). At the start of January 2012, the Department of Social Protection reduced its rent assistance payments by up to 29% (an average of 13%) and the Department says that some 40% of the rented market in the State is affected by rent assistance payments, which at the end of 2011, was paid to 98,603 households. The Department’s 40% is derived from information provided to it by the Private Residential Tenancies Board. The Department is projecting it will save €55m in 2012 from its €500m budget for rent assistance, the saving comprising €33m to changes to the minimum contribution and €22m in relation to the new maximum limits.
So Beth sought eternity in Shakespeare’s plethora of verses composed for love, and with each word, her need for such reminders of the immortal increased. Tragedies reached their mangled hands down her mouth, down her throat, and into her breast to unseat her soul and pull it out with a bittersweet pain. Those tortured tunes taught the misunderstanding and strife that greeted love’s fantasy within Beth’s world. The comedies rang the bells of their odd marriages through the church of Beth’s mind, reminding her that in every affair there lay lunacy amid the lust. A song of immortality sang forth from sonnets that begged the reader to pretend they were written only for her, that the poet spoke only to her. With those words, emotions became eternal. And the love that Shakespeare loved was the love that caused Beth to fall in love. But she never brought it out into the light. This sweet, young girl never brought that heart of hers, a heart that had been grown and nurtured under the watchful eye of the greatest teacher of all time, into the presence of one who might view and appreciate its beautiful proportions. No man ever felt the caress of this bookish girl because no man could overpower the eternal promise and integrity of Shakespeare’s undying emotion. Beth’s love lived only in herself; that is, until an image from her mind stepped forth and began to breathe of life.
And Something has Happened
But did he, really? As it the trend with celebrities, the public has this inate impression that because somebody is under the scrutiny of the public eye, they have to maintain saint-like goodness every waking moment of the day and that any stumbling bad boy act they carry out is multiplied in severity to the nth degree. That’s not possible. Granted, Lennon has had his fair share of temper-shredding moments on the pitch, but that’s not to say that Rangers’ mangerial staff have been angelic either. At the end of the day, Lennon is an ordinary man with a wife and children. He just happens to manage a football team that has long-since-faded Catholic roots at its core.
The list had Butcher, 2 Devastators, Great Bears, Manhunter, and Doom Reavers. She played with eSorscha, the Behemoth, a Juggernaut, Widowmakers, min Shocktroopers and the dog. I basically ran forward, lost a few Doom Reavers and the Manhunter on the approach and then charged into her big wall of metal. But with enough feated weapon master charge attacks (5 dice damage rolls), a few non-charge attacks (oh no, only 4 dice), and a Fury ridden Devastator (two P+S 19 initial attacks), there was little less in front of me and a lot of damage to spare.
Working with my group on this project was really fun and easy. We met twice to collaborate on the project and the approach to getting it completed and we also communicated via text and e-mail. I think what we did really played a big part in the success of our website. Everyone knew what they had to do and what was needed in order to complete this project. Therefore, I would not change a thing about what we did or how we did it. I do not plan on using any of the group strategies in the next project since we are not required to work in groups.
There is almost nothing that is not overly positive I can say about this book. Almost True is amazing, and it climbing it's way to the top of the List of My Favourite Books, as we speak. Well, I write and you read, but whatever. Keren David is an extraordinary writer, and if you don;t go and read her books and praise her almost immediately, then I promise that I will virtually murder you with a broom. (In the best way possible, mind you. Oh, and yes, I do know that I am insane, thank you very much. There is nothing that you or I can do about it.) The plot and the characterization are perfect, the cover isn't quite perfect but whatever. Small details do not concern me, for this book is compelling. So much so, and please disregard that comment on how long it took me to read this. Just that part, though. Not the part about it being good. It is very good, which is why the Darklings and me believe that you should read it. We are not misguided for once.
Thus mellow'd to that tender light
The pattern calls for an internal zippered pocket which is the same size as the bag lining. I was very hesitant about this idea but went with the pattern. The zip is sandwiched between two pocket pieces and then attached to a bag top piece. It is a great idea because you end up with a lovely neat finish.
10. Mumbo Link
Sometimes talking with liberals is perplexing. You never know what claim they will make next or what name they will call you. Take David Axelrod’s response to Standard & Poor’s recent credit action: He calls it the “Tea Party downgrade.” Amazingly, he blames the United States’ loss of its AAA bond rating on the one group that has sounded the alarm about our fiscal crisis. How did the president’s leading adviser come up with a label so detached from reality?
Have you ever struggled with a situation like this?
The Scientific American, in a recent issue, pleads for the restoration to respectable usage of that "fine old word 'propaganda.'" "There is no word in the English language," it says, "whose meaning has been so sadly distorted as the word 'propaganda.' The change took place mainly during the late war when the term took on a decidedly sinister complexion. "If you turn to the Standard Dictionary, you will find that the word was applied to a congregation or society of cardinals for the care and oversight of foreign missions which was instituted at Rome in the year 1627. It was applied also to the College of the Propaganda at Rome that was founded by Pope Urban VIII, for the education of the missionary priests. Hence, in later years the word came to be applied to any institution or scheme for propagating a doctrine or system. "Judged by this definition, we can see that in its true sense propaganda is a perfectly legitimate form of human activity. Any society, whether it be social, religious or political, which is possessed of certain beliefs, and sets out to make them known, either by the spoken or written words, is practicing propaganda. "Truth is mighty and must prevail, and if any body of men believe that they have discovered a valuable truth, it is not merely their privilege but their duty to disseminate that truth. If they realize, as they quickly must, that this spreading of the truth can be done upon a large scale and effectively only by organized effort, they will make use of the press and the platform as the best means to give it wide circulation. Propaganda becomes vicious and reprehensive only when its authors consciously and deliberately disseminate what they know to be lies, or when they aim at effects which they know to be prejudicial to the common good. " 'Propaganda' in its proper meaning is a perfectly wholesome word, of honest parentage, and with an honorable history. The fact that it should to-day be carrying a sinister meaning merely shows how much of the child remains in the average adult. A group of citizens writes and talks in favor of a certain course of action in some debatable question, believing that it is promoting the best interest of the community. Propaganda? Not a bit of it. Just a plain forceful statement of truth. But let another group of citizens express opposing views, and they are promptly labeled with the sinister name of propaganda. . . . " 'What is sauce for the goose is sauce for the gander,' says a wise old proverb. Let us make haste to put this fine old word back where it belongs, and restore its dignified significance for the use of our children and our children's children." The extent to which propaganda shapes the progress of affairs about us may surprise even well informed persons. Nevertheless, it is only necessary to look under the surface of the newspaper for a hint as to propaganda's authority over public opinion. Page one of the New York Times on the day these paragraphs are written contains eight important news stories. Four of them, or one-half, are propaganda. The casual reader accepts them as accounts of spontaneous happenings. But are they? Here are the headlines which announce them: "TWELVE NATIONS WARN CHINA REAL REFORM MUST COME BEFORE THEY GIVE RELIEF," "PRITCHETT REPORTS ZIONISM WILL FAIL," "REALTY MEN DEMAND A TRANSIT INQUIRY," and "OUR LIVING STANDARD HIGHEST IN HISTORY, SAYS HOOVER REPORT." Take them in order: the article on China explains the joint report of the Commission on Extraterritoriality in China, presenting an exposition of the Powers' stand in the Chinese muddle. What it says is less important than what it is. It was "made public by the State Department to-day" with the purpose of presenting to the American public a picture of the State Department's position. Its source gives it authority, and the American public tends to accept and support the State Department view. The report of Dr. Pritchett, a trustee of the Carnegie Foundation for International Peace, is an attempt to find the facts about this Jewish colony in the midst of a restless Arab world. When Dr. Pritchett's survey convinced him that in the long run Zionism would "bring more bitterness and more unhappiness both for the Jew and for the Arab," this point of view was broadcast with all the authority of the Carnegie Foundation, so that the public would hear and believe. The statement by the president of the Real Estate Board of New York, and Secretary Hoover's report, are similar attempts to influence the public toward an opinion. These examples are not given to create the impression that there is anything sinister about propaganda. They are set down rather to illustrate how conscious direction is given to events, and how the men behind these events influence public opinion. As such they are examples of modern propaganda. At this point we may attempt to define propaganda. Modern propaganda is a consistent, enduring effort to create or shape events to influence the relations of the public to an enterprise, idea or group. This practice of creating circumstances and of creating pictures in the minds of millions of persons is very common. Virtually no important undertaking is now carried on without it, whether that enterprise be building a cathedral, endowing a university, marketing a moving picture, floating a large bond issue, or electing a president. Sometimes the effect on the public is created by a professional propagandist, sometimes by an amateur deputed for the job. The important thing is that it is universal and continuous; and in its sum total it is regimenting the public mind every bit as much as an army regiments the bodies of its soldiers. So vast are the numbers of minds which can be regimented, and so tenacious are they when regimented, that a group at times offers an irresistible pressure before which legislators, editors, and teachers are helpless. The group will cling to its stereotype, as Walter Lippmann calls it, making of those supposedly powerful beings, the leaders of public opinion, mere bits of driftwood in the surf. When an Imperial Wizard, sensing what is perhaps hunger for an ideal, offers a picture of a nation all Nordic and nationalistic, the common man of the older American stock, feeling himself elbowed out of his rightful position and prosperity by the newer immigrant stocks, grasps the picture which fits in so neatly with his prejudices, and makes it his own. He buys the sheet and pillow-case costume, and bands with his fellows by the thousand into a huge group powerful enough to swing state elections and to throw a ponderous monkey wrench into a national convention. In our present social organization approval of the public is essential to any large undertaking. Hence a laudable movement may be lost unless it impresses itself on the public mind. Charity, as well as business, and politics and literature, for that matter, have had to adopt propaganda, for the public must be regimented into giving money just as it must be regimented into tuberculosis prophylaxis. The Near East Relief, the Association for the Improvement of the Condition of the Poor of New York, and all the rest, have to work on public opinion just as though they had tubes of tooth paste to sell. We are proud of our diminishing infant death rate—and that too is the work of propaganda. Propaganda does exist on all sides of us, and it does change our mental pictures of the world. Even if this be unduly pessimistic—and that remains to be proved—the opinion reflects a tendency that is undoubtedly real. In fact, its use is growing as its efficiency in gaining public support is recognized. This then, evidently indicates the fact that any one with sufficient influence can lead sections of the public at least for a time and for a given purpose. Formerly the rulers were the leaders. They laid out the course of history, by the simple process of doing what they wanted. And if nowadays the successors of the rulers, those whose position or ability gives them power, can no longer do what they want without the approval of the masses, they find in propaganda a tool which is increasingly powerful in gaining that approval. Therefore, propaganda is here to stay. It was, of course, the astounding success of propaganda during the war that opened the eyes of the intelligent few in all departments of life to the possibilities of regimenting the public mind. The American government and numerous patriotic agencies developed a technique which, to most persons accustomed to bidding for public acceptance, was new. They not only appealed to the individual by means of every approach—visual, graphic, and auditory—to support the national endeavor, but they also secured the cooperation of the key men in every group —persons whose mere word carried authority to hundreds or thousands or hundreds of thousands of followers. They thus automatically gained the support of fraternal, religious, commercial, patriotic, social and local groups whose members took their opinions from their accustomed leaders and spokesmen, or from the periodical publications which they were accustomed to read and believe. At the same time, the manipulators of patriotic opinion made use of the mental cliches and the emotional habits of the public to produce mass reactions against the alleged atrocities, the terror and the tyranny of the enemy. It was only natural, after the war ended, that intelligent persons should ask themselves whether it was not possible to apply a similar technique to the problems of peace. As a matter of fact, the practice of propaganda since the war has assumed very different forms from those prevalent twenty years ago. This new technique may fairly be called the new propaganda. It takes account not merely of the individual, nor even of the mass mind alone, but also and especially of the anatomy of society, with its interlocking group formations and loyalties. It sees the individual not only as a cell in the social organism but as a cell organized into the social unit. Touch a nerve at a sensitive spot and you get an automatic response from certain specific members of the organism. Business offers graphic examples of the effect that may be produced upon the public by interested groups, such as textile manufacturers losing their markets. This problem arose, not long ago, when the velvet manufacturers were facing ruin because their product had long been out of fashion. Analysis showed that it was impossible to revive a velvet fashion within America. Anatomical hunt for the vital spot! Paris! Obviously! But yes and no. Paris is the home of fashion. Lyons is the home of silk. The attack had to be made at the source. It was determined to substitute purpose for chance and to utilize the regular sources for fashion distribution and to influence the public from these sources. A velvet fashion service, openly supported by the manufacturers, was organized. Its first function was to establish contact with the Lyons manufactories and the Paris couturiers to discover what they were doing, to encourage them to act on behalf of velvet, and to help in the proper exploitation of their wares. An intelligent Parisian was enlisted in the work. He visited Lanvin and Worth, Agnes and Patou, and others and induced them to use velvet in their gowns and hats. It was he who arranged for the distinguished Countess This or Duchess That to wear the hat or the gown. And as for the presentation of the idea to the public, the American buyer or the American woman of fashion was simply shown the velvet creations in the atelier of the dressmaker or the milliner. She bought the velvet because she liked it and because it was in fashion. The editors of the American magazines and fashion reporters of the American newspapers, likewise subjected to the actual (although created) circumstance, reflected it in their news, which, in turn, subjected the buyer and the consumer here to the same influences. The result was that what was at first a trickle of velvet became a flood. A demand was slowly, but deliberately, created in Paris and America. A big department store, aiming to be a style leader, advertised velvet gowns and hats on the authority of the French couturiers, and quoted original cables received from them. The echo of the new style note was heard from hundreds of department stores throughout the country which wanted to be style leaders too. Bulletins followed despatches. The mail followed the cables. And the American woman traveler appeared before the ship news photographers in velvet gown and hat. The created circumstances had their effect. "Fickle fashion has veered to velvet," was one newspaper comment. And the industry in the United States again kept thousands busy. The new propaganda, having regard to the constitution of society as a whole, not infrequently serves to focus and realize the desires of the masses. A desire for a specific reform, however widespread, cannot be translated into action until it is made articulate, and until it has exerted sufficient pressure upon the proper law-making bodies. Millions of housewives may feel that manufactured foods deleterious to health should be prohibited. But there is little chance that their individual desires will be translated into effective legal form unless their halfexpressed demand can be organized, made vocal, and concentrated upon the state legislature or upon the Federal Congress in some mode which will produce the results they desire. Whether they realize it or not, they call upon propaganda to organize and effectuate their demand. But clearly it is the intelligent minorities which need to make use of propaganda continuously and systematically. In the active proselytizing minorities in whom selfish interests and public interests coincide lie the progress and development of America. Only through the active energy of the intelligent few can the public at large become aware of and act upon new ideas. Small groups of persons can, and do, make the rest of us think what they please about a given subject. But there are usually proponents and opponents of every propaganda, both of whom are equally eager to convince the majority.
It was a straight up trade; I just didn’t let the manager know that old chess set was a swiped item from twenty-five years ago. No! No, I didn’t swipe it. I traded for it about ten, eleven years ago for a pocket knife. I got a paid pass to a High School Fund raiser concert in Beau Mount, as part of poker pot. I didn’t want to go to the concert, so I traded the pass for the knife and then the knife for the chess set.
You can watch TV or Podcasts, Read, Chat with a buddy
POPULATION 5,243
In Natalie's words...
In the past the push for bypasses came from two directions: the shippers and travelers who didn't want to be slowed down, and the neighbors who didn't want traffic. But the reason the neighbors didn't want traffic was because the traffic was dangerous, noisy and polluting. Cities like Detroit and neighborhoods like Bronzeville will never come back until through traffic can cross them at a safe, human scale.
9 around
There is a great new store there too called RISD Works. They'd never heard of Zentangle. And I want to see my books there, since I am an alum and all that.
We bought neither.
One lesson learned by Carroll is that whether a tourist or a traveller, you are only passing through, you never get the chance to fully engage with other people. You really are ships that pass in the night. And I get the sense that Carroll wants, or was hoping for, more than this out of the experience. She tries to get this sense of permanence, against all the odds, in Cambodia. I’ll spoil the narrative if I give too much away, but suffice it to say that despite all the problems that beset her, she feels it imperative to ‘pay back’ and ‘thank’ those with whom she shared the most intense experiences.
“Where their worm dieth not, and the fire is not quenched.”
Were there any doubt that kidney is male, these have now been dealth with.
On their Daddy's birthday, we held up cards we had made. Peter went traditional, using stickers, stampers, markers, and crayons. I used virtual markers and paint, via a drawing program on my iPad.
It’s the end of the world
The sister says, “I’ve never seen you switch.”
I remember being scared while I was pregnant. I was not sure how I was going to raise two babies at once. But I want to give credit to my husband. He really stepped up the way I envisioned a dad should do. And he continues to be my biggest support. If it were not for him, I am not sure where I would be. I also want to credit my family and friends. They were very supportive when the babies were first born and through out the first year. I have to say I am really blessed to have such a strong support system.
- background stamped in silver using a Stampendous 'Cling Snow Swirl' stamp, and a little set of Hero Arts 'Tiny Snowflakes' peg stamps to fill in some gaps
Have you had to come to an associate’s aid because she fell off her desk after trying to climb on top of it using a rolling chair?
Like all things in life, a great wardrobe starts with a good foundation. So build your foundation with timeless pieces that you can wear forever. Then add some trendy items to give your foundation some flavor. Last but not least, when purchasing a trendy item be sure to shop around. You want to make sure you get the best deal possible on items that might be out of style next season.
I love this story. Your style reminds me of Raymond Carver, sparse, quiet, elegant, tender.
And most of all I would like to thank my God who loved me enough to watch His own Son bleed and die on my behalf. He walked with me through fire that night. I felt His hand on me when I was certain I was alone. He shined light into the darkest period of my life. I can honestly say that, although I was scared and uncertain about what the future would look like, I was confident that He held me, and Erin, in His hands and that there was nothing that would come upon us that He would not sustain us through. He is my Rock, my Shield and my Defender. He is Faithful and True and He is, and always will be, the friend that sticks closer than a brother. You have most certainly changed things. Thank you, Father!
Have African Americans evolved since they first came to North America? The question may seem strange. Doesn’t evolution happen over millions of years? The first slaves disembarked in the future United States back in 1619 and the last ones arrived (illegally) in the 1850s. That’s about three centuries. How could any population evolve over so short a time?
Businessmen pointed out the only police assistance of any value was received from the public order policing service (Pops) based in Oudtshoorn and reinforcements sent from Cape Town.
First up you might consider the "reassuringly expensive" range of beers from the likes of Hopfen-Fluch or Braufactum. These will usually be grossly overpriced imitations of non-German styles like IPAs or stouts. They are always of a decent standard, but unfortunately they usually cost around twice as much as importing the real thing from abroad via websites like Bierkompass or Bierzwerg.
to be if I'm not bleeding.
EXAMPLES OF THE IMPORTANT:
*Medium - Promarkers & Flexmarkers
Yet, living in a rural area was quite new to me. Suddenly, I was aware of the growing season; it’s hard to miss when you live next to tobacco fields, smell manure (year round, I swear) in the parking lot of the nearest shopping center, and are constantly stuck driving behind a tractor. However,
My Bible verse for the Anniversary Release, is:
Don Lee – Seoul National University, Korea
In study after study, researchers have found no evidence for innate talent as the prerequisite for success. Nor have they found that hard work alone makes certain people great. While successful people—those who achieve excellence in a domain—do work very hard, it’s how they work that distinguishes them from others. It turns out that just putting in hours and hours at your chosen work is not enough; the only way to get better is to make sure you’re devoting those hours to what the researchers call “deliberate practice.”
"Divisadero.. but first, I have to pick up some medication."
Perhaps this last idea is succinctly exemplified in the way we will spend a vacation in an exotic foreign land squinting through our cameras rather than soaking up the views with our full vision, or instead of silently watching a movie or taking in a vista in rapture, find ourselves saying "isn't this fun?" or "Oh, look at that mountain, honey!" or "Caitlin, are you having a good time?" as if needing to constantly bring ourselves back from the abyss of pure egoless presence, preferring to work on solidifying the memory of joy via photos and speech/writing rather than abandoning language and recording devices at the door, so to speak.Writing helps us remember moments that we never really had a chance to feel because we couldn't wait to get home and write about them. We think if we let go of the rope it will never come back, but it does, a new and better one, electric, plugged right into mainline of God's flexed arm like a two-way morphine drip.
Vicki Macris, University of Alberta, Calgary, Canada: Towards a Pedagogy of Philoxenia (Hospitality): Negotiating Policy Priorities for Immigrant Students in Greek Public Schools
Austerity isn’t a consequence of reduced government spending but of other government actions – taxes that are too high, interest rates that are too low, running the Royal Mint’s printing presses at full whack and failing to cut spending. Yes that’s right – failing to cut spending.
Senators voted 51 to 46 along party lines to set aside the measure, known as the “cut, cap and balance” bill, which was sent to the Senate by the House this week and seen by conservative House members as their preferred option for increasing the debt ceiling. For many House Republicans, the legislation was their best offer in the continuing standoff with President Obama and Congressional Democrats.
I didn't expect to see such normal looking children when I went there. Their outward appearance has nothing to do with their fucked up their iddy biddy brains. They are much slower to develop and when they get older they have a very hard time figuring out right from wrong along with a whole lot of other shit.
Thanks for stopping by the X-Press It blog today.....we hope we have given you some hints and tips on how to use the Mask It product......don't forget to leave a comment for the month of April and a random winner will be chosen to win next months product feature.......a pack of the X-Press It Double Sided Sheets!!!!
I enjoy: my family, my faith life, photography, drawing; writing, working on cars, basketball, football, and baseball. These are just a few of the many things I like...you'll just have to read my blog to know me better to know more of them. Other things you may not catch on that I enjoy are: cats, angels, ballroom dancing, Christian music, The Catholic Cathechism, camping (being one with nature and all of God's creations), traveling, cherry and apple blossoms, and the colors blue (in all shades), white, black, dark purple, and SOME shades of pink. (Rainbows are cool, too. And I'm NOT a lesbian! Although, I'm friends with some gays and lesbians. ) I am a proud Roman Catholic (feel free to ask questions as it helps me to grow in my faith). I am also a Type Two (2) diabetic. I graduated from Johnson County Community College, where I majored in Animation in hopes of fullfiling my dreams of being a computer generated animation movie maker. I also have a degree in Corporate Communication from Avila University. I'm currently employed at Nestle Toll House Cafe/Haagen Dazs (located at the lower level of Oak Park Mall across from Le Gourmet Chef and Pagoda), and am single. My favorite time of year is Winter and the Christmas season! It's just so...well, I can't put it into words. ^_^
Well I did one with a penguin
Marty: "Doc! No! Whoa. 1955."
For your amusement:
3. Add in pinto beans, Lentil soup, ketchup, dark brown sugar, minced parsley and bay leaves.
Proper specialist education, speech, language and behavioural therapies, dietary interventions and some medications can all help.
The Story of Beatrice Banks-
"Don't change so people will like you. Be yourself and the right people will love the real you."
Chuck was at a late meeting; I had to call someone and share the news.
Do not let the ending detract you from Mass Effect 3 especially if you have played through Mass Effect 1 and 2. This is a 30-40 hour epic that is both fun and intense. Multiplayer is enjoyable and actually adds to the single player. Bioware goes straight for the gut and doesn’t let go. They have come such a long way through in terms of gameplay, graphics and they created such a rich universe that is very hard to ignore.
Let's take a closer look, shall we?
1 package tri-color spiral noodles
The cynic in me wonders if Wes Moore, the author, is bound for a career in politics. And I wonder if this book wasn’t just his “Dreams From My Father.” But then so what if it is? He’d be a great candidate. Wouldn’t we be lucky to have a guy like this as an elected official? Someone who knows intimately the struggles of African-American families? Someone who faced a choice about how to live his life and who found mentors and role models to help him go the right direction? Maybe I’m cynical or maybe I’m hopeful.
Customization- What specific values, beliefs and assumptions should you address? What will be their objections?
So whats my point? Remember a few entries back I talked about necessity of our minds being involved when it comes to change. Well I let my mind talk me out of what promises to be a fruitful mission for all involved. I sabotaged myself or at least tried to. But hey, I’m getting smarter, I’m getting stronger and I’m trusting more and what does all that add up to? I’ll tell you it adds up to VICTORY!
“The blockade itself has cost us tens of millions of rupees in losses. This does not include the damages suffered in the attacks.
rie kugimiya voiced koto and she is my favorite seiyuu because she do all the tsundere and crazy girl voices perfectly and in this show, she just nailed it!
Plot Synopsis:
Anyways, moving on. Make sure to not hog the conversation, and make sure you’re not mute.Having an equal share of thoughtful, (sometimes) meaningful words concludes to a satisfying conversation.
And he stood still and poised and answered "yes what you say is true - these allegations have merit"
By this time in Canada it is normally getting really cold. While I love the fall, I could really live without the cold damp days that often come with it. Just last weekend I was expressing my frustration as we ran from the car into the fall. It was so cold out it took about 15 minutes for me to warm up. This was definitely not the case today. Today the weather in Canada was 74, to me it felt way warmer. My Dad originally had the pool scheduled to be closed last week but since the forecast was so nice he post-poned it until next week. Good thing because The Girl wanted to swim!
Funny, I haven't been settling for a long time now. We moved to Geneva knowing we'd be someday leaving Geneva. We were not "lifers" (as we call anyone who goes and settles there). We knew we'd leave. So we did not completely settle.
Bought by Derby Museum and Art Gallery at Mellors and Kirk Fine Art Auctioneers, Nottingham.
A Well, last year 17% of our revenue was admissions. But that was including all of the admissions—admission to special exhibitions as well as to the permanent collection. What that doesn’t include is membership.
Today is Armed Forces Day, a day to honor our brave military. I am so grateful to the men and women in the past and present who have fought for our right to remain free. Really, we should honor them every day!
2011-03-04 08:46
Then when he retired . . . he still photocopied the puzzle every day, for his beautiful bride. He took the copy, mom took the original. Naturally. Mom would have it no other way.
Now, the problem with the Great River is that it has pretty quest rewards. I don’t know where they all come from. But, as Hymne of Cosmetic Lotro noted in this post, they’re breathing new life into old PvMP gear. And that suits me just fine and dandy, because I am entirely too big a coward to ever venture out into the Moors. So, the hood featured in the above post became an object of some obsession for me. And wouldn’t you know it, that pale gold accent colour goes just perfectly with the stunning pale gold that’s sort of the colour theme of the Ost Dunhoth set.
Future additions to the UAMC Force include: UAMC Hardsuits (power armor), Female Marines, and Heavy Weapons sets all coming in spring and summer 2012.
"I think we are sending a very wrong message to the world. If Africa doesn't care about Africa, how do you expect other countries and other continents to care about this continent? We need to be more proactive. We spend too much time in meetings and discussions."
I am praying that something new happens in me this year and I pray that you will also experience something fresh and deep as you wait with the family of God between the moments of death and re-birth. Let’s not miss the Ruach (breath) of God this year, watch and wait carefully for Him and then open the doors to your heart once again.
Of course, the science that blew his entire claim totally out of the water didn’t stop Wilhelm von Osten, the owner of the horse, from touring the country with him and continuing to make utterly baseless claims. This, in turn, is a good example of how retarded some people can get when they shut their basic critical faculties down in favour of not having to admit that they’ve ever been wrong.
Body: This includes goals and activities that have to do with your physical body, such as having good health, being fit, and hygiene.
These are among your biggest blunders.
Mata Hari was surely dead.”
1 heated
I used papers from Kraft, Core'dinations, DCSV, and MME. Cricut Cartridge: Give a Hoot for the leaves; Twine in Honeydew, Mandarin, and Cappuccino; VersaMagic ink in Jumbo Java; Jolee's Boutique for the acorn (don't you love the stitching on it) and the bling inside. I am entering this card in the following challenges:
To properly understand the Parisian, to get a handle on what makes him tick, you need to have undertaken years of intensive, on-the-ground research. Entire days must be given over to the singular activity of lazing in a terrace café, sipping Sancerre and watching the world go by. You have to be prepared to drop everything and commit yourself to a daily (and nightly) regimen of bar-hopping, brasserie hanging and restaurant haunting.
By providing an outside force for players to gather against, the GM can provide some reason for such players to travel together. This may not solve all of the problems of an evil campaign, but it does take care of at least the first issue; why should they trust each other.
How can you support a country, run by religious zealots, where you would be murdered for being gay?
Me and Owen have finally got around to sorting out a meeting for tomorrow evening so hopefully We’ll be able to jumpstart our WIP that I am stuttering on. I also get the feeling he’s going to tell me more about the next story set in this universe that he is working on. This meeting is long over due and is very much-needed to address some world building issues that have cropped up. I am also keen to see what Owen thinks of what I’ve done with his original plan with this story.
Las Hayas Trek
Richer than most wines labelled as Bourgogne, the earthy characters really come through, as does red cherry acidity and clean, chalky tannins. The bright red fruit really shows on the palate too, in balance with the acids and tannin.
6. Who Needs the Peace Corps? (02:46)
He winced because he knew what I meant.
Bead Trends is currently looking for designs with the following themes for our April 2012 issue:
Surprise! Hi guys, just had to have a go when I saw Nikki's (Limited Runs) Mushroom House (I love mushroom houses) Sorry I couldn't make a card, so this is completely digital!! I coloured the digi in PaintNet. Missing you all, hope to be back soon! ((Lyn))
Communucations Specialist
2. Chick-fil-A Spicy Chicken Sandwich
Does galaxy print ever get old? It's good that Christoper Kane's legacy from his cosmic collection lives on - I don't know about you, but I rather like wearing a starry sky as a dress. True, space print is the last thing you would expect me to wear on this blog, since my outfits are usually so far removed from the world of "high fashion". Yet something about this particular look really inspires me; a fascination that I have - will always have - with all things magical (I used to collect dragons and write letters to authors and Harry Potter casting directors with quill pen and ink, such a cool child). Besides, it's fun to try something new, is it not?
each with his own work,
I now have a brewery as a client.
My second favorite recipe?
It's highly recommended you get at LEAST 76 agility for arctic grinds; with 76 agility, you will USUALLY go before other monsters. I think it's about 70 or 80% of the time with that much. More agility is fine too. The arctic provides some good drops too, so you can make more money by selling them. This agility also works decently for the crypt. For the black sanctum, I think 80s are more ideal. Not that you'll outspeed totems or specters, but for the rest of the normal mobs, you will be fine. (90s can sometimes outspeed totems to give you an idea)
A major claim of the report is that the Australian media is failing the public interest. There are five examples of malicious media action provided late in the report and reference to the News of the World phone hacking scandal as the origin of the inquiry. But the core evidence provided for the apparent failure of the media and subsequent recommendation for meta-regulation of the free press is a series of opinion surveys.
I used a nutrition calculator to compare 1 Cup of Wonder Flour with 1 Cup of White Flour. You can see that wonder flour has fewer calories per serving, more potassium, fewer carbohydrates, a LOT more dietary fiber (really good for you!). Of course white flour is enriched so it has some good things in there for you, but you really are missing all the fiber!
Hamdan heard the party could get animals and he wants one. What does he want (roll on chart) a moose, hah. The mage in trying to negotiate (with his 8 char) says "Big-ass, dog-headed panda . . . we can pull that off." At least I think that's when he said it I wrote it down as amusing to me. Another note I wrote down was from him list of material components he's gathered: "creepy midget monk honey." That's entertainment.
The One and Only Ivan by Katherine Applegate tells the story of Ivan, a Silverback gorilla, and his friends: Stella, an old elephant and Bob, a stray dog. They perform three shows every day at Exit 8 Big Top Mall. When business slows, Ruby, a baby elephant, is brought on board and things change. This is a lovely story, funny for sure, and it will get and keep your interest. I think this is a book for all ages. It will touch your heart and put a smile on your face! I enjoyed it very much and the ending is so, so good!
Officials found the infected animal during routine monitoring, county environmental health officials said. Humans can catch the often-fatal disease if they are bitten by infected fleas.
On Her Majesty's Secret Service
Spanish bank Banesto has placed over 4,000 properties for sale “with prices of 20 years ago”, they said in a statement.
She had to admit that it was a little gratifying to see the sand fly from her foot, covering Chelsea’s sub-sandwich and freshly oiled stomach. Grinning slightly, the tears stopped flowing. She rubbed her eyes.
Placing pieces
Many Thanks to all of you that entered last weeks challenge...all 525 of you, scroll down a little for the winner...
Journal Questions:
wares in a worn out cart
variable light into the nine chords three piece pattern
Rotating toys keeps kids interested and makes them easier to manage. We store our rotated toys in a toy box that we keep in the little ones closet.
A diagram of cognitive dissonance theory. Dissonance reduction can be accomplished in various ways, broadly including the addition of more, consonant elements, or else changing the existing elements. (Photo credit: Wikipedia)
7 ) When your boyfriend categorises you as an “acquaintance” on Facebook.
Councillors Rams and Evangeli have now decided that the council plans for new charges in the free parking plots must be opposed. They have suddenly become outraged by these proposals. They are going to take action. What can they do? Well, they have announced their own 'consultation' - an idiotic idea, not only because it is about six months too late, but because Barnet Tories never take the slightest bit of notice of any consultation, especially any real opposition to policies, and indeed Brian Coleman, the Cabinet member for environmental issues prides himself on his refusal to listen to petitions, emails and pleas from residents foolishly attempting to persuade him that he might actually, er, sshh, be wrong about something ...
26You are all sons of God through faith in Christ Jesus, 27for all of you who were baptized into Christ have clothed yourselves with Christ. 28There is neither Jew nor Greek, slave nor free, male nor female, for you are all one in Christ Jesus. 29If you belong to Christ, then you are Abraham’s seed, and heirs according to the promise.
Maybe I have been gathering a little too much!
Hope you had just as great of a weekend. Thanks for stopping by!
Having been reminded that I haven't posted lately, perhaps I can rectify that situation by sharing some weekend photos.
Why now? Well I spent an hour or two today sorting my scraps. They went from this:
Kinda want to step out of the box of a traditional slipcovered chair but not sure... We have a bit of a contemporary look going in there so I'm thinking I could get away with something fun. I'd love to hear your thoughts. Send any good chair finds my way- preferably on the cheapie side..
The Muscovy ducks started laying a few weeks ago, but weren’t sitting, so we ended up collecting a lot of them. They’re not bad eating and very good for cooking. On Monday, however, Midnight got the urge and has been faithfully attending a nesting box full of eggs ever since. If all goes well, we should be seeing our first batch of ducklings mid-May.
minimal purchases for the
Retail therapy is good for you. It can increase your life span according to a study published in The Journal of Epidemiology and Community Health. Maybe my mother was on to something with our frequent shopping adventures to the department stores in downtown Toronto and the shops on the Danforth. As I write in my memoir:
Producer: Nick Gomm
In a perfect world investing in businesses that employ people and create wealth is a good thing.
You can win these two stamps It's a Boy and It's a Girl.
2nd Prize: Nejc Levstik, from the Academy of theatre, radio, film and television in Slovenia.
Ms. Tango Lizzie: Dials 911. The big burly nurses from the insane asylum from which Mr. Tango Collins had escaped a mere 24 hours ago arrive. They chase down Mr. Tango Collins, put him in a straitjacket, and drag him away.
Aquarius is like red clay
Racked: 04-10-2008
Nothing wrong in that I hear you cry! She has been many times before with me and her dad and other friends with their parents. Today, though I let her go with no parent and they made their own way there. They took the bus, which would take about 45 minutes and had to save their tickets, and be at the bus stop for the correct time for the return journey.
Well, this month has been another fun filled one for us. Benson has achieved one of the greatest milestones that he will accomplish in his lifetime. He is now sleeping through the night! And, before you think that it just happened, it definitely came with a lot of dedication and hard work on our(his parents) part, thanks to Babywise! Also, it isn't a full nights sleep for him yet, but he will go anywhere from 7-10 hours. He is sticking to about 7-8 right now. Let me tell you I feel like a new woman, getting all this uninterrupted sleep.
3. Make your schedule flexible
The second article was also about sex work, but this time regarding a brothel which disguises itself as a massage parlour. In this article the journalist pretends to be a young girl applying for a job as a masseuse at what is actually a brothel. This is interesting, because it shows how easily women who are in desperate need of employment could end up in prostitution when they are really just looking for a job. What the article doesn’t tell you is that this brothel has put ads in the newspaper (the same one which ran the article), claiming to be looking for masseuses and receptionists, and also the newspaper runs advertisements geared towards this brothels clients encouraging them to make an appointment with their new girls.
In prison, they take you everywhere you need to go.
The night it finally ended, Wednesday, December 13, I watched the speeches on television just like everybody else. I was back in my apartment in New York, ready to resume my life, but still held in some kind of suspended animation by this horrible, tedious process. But now, yes, it was over.
Number of friends and followers on:
On Friday in Reno, Nev., President Obama discussed the impact of his refinancing changes announced in October.
Opinion: I find it kind of boring. It’s quite boyish, but not in a way I’m a fan of. It almost feels like a variant of Daniel. It would be more unique than Danielle though (and a bit of a nicer name).
Belgian modernist Raf Simons was announced as Creative Director of Christian Dior yesterday, thus bringing to a close the biggest fashion recruitment drama since Tom Ford left the Gucci job vacant back in 2004.
“Can we talk? “ asked the sidewalk counsellor.
Publisher: Doubleday Canada
It's early - I'm rambling - I'm going to put on some jeans and wait for Bella.
Lily and Lia, on the other hand? Ugh! We missed so many days, we were asked to re-register them several times as new students! They shared everything, from dolls to clothes to germs to mischief, earning the nicknames 'carriers, twin twisters, and thing 1 and thing 2.' But, what a year each had at school. We are so blessed to have them as daughters - thank you Jesus! Knowing Lily and Lia's lifesongs and being a part of who they are and who they are becoming has been one of the greatest blessings ever for us. There's not a day that goes by without Lia Faith looking up at me with those deep, brown eyes and proclaiming "Daddy, you the best daddy in the whole world!" Lily follows up with "You know how much I love you? ... Thiiiiiiiiiiiiiiis Muuuuuuch!" It's simply too hard to describe in words how that impacts me each day.
Welcome to the University of Ottawa Art History Club’s official blog. You will find updates about club happenings and other important information on this page.
No song I could sing
A military scene with a difference or two. The soldiers on the left are enjoying what they see, and the drill sergeant is shouting...what?
Yeah except for 2 things ..
Everything is great except that it does not recognize the magenta cartridge about half the time. Every time it happens you have to fight with it to get it to print. The manual the CIS comes with says to take out the cartridges turn off the printer, replace, then turn back on. I have done this repeatedly up to at least 5 times with out it working. I find it best just to turn it off and walk away. Come back later. Which really sucks when you’ve got to get something you need to get printed at that very moment.
“So, when your dad murders people…is it a long, drawn out process…or does he just cut to the chase?”
4. Why aren't we taught the whole truth about Columbus' actions and the devastating consequences of those actions? Why are we only told about Columbus, who as a boy who always wanted to sail and then when he got older Spain provided him three ships & he sailed across the ocean andDISCOVERED A NEW WORLD! (where millions of Taino had lived for thousands of years and which we now call the Caribbean Why are we only taught about that FIRST voyage, and not the other 3 voyages, when all hell broke loose? Why aren't we taught about how on the second voyage, unlike the first when Columbus only had 3 small old ships, Columbus was given 17 large ships and 1,500 armed men eagerly signed up for the chance to go to the "New World" with hopes of getting rich quick on the gold to be found there?
5nos Curry leaves
Just how pathetic you turned out to be.
for them to navigate, so they fell and plunged themselves deeper into darkness.
Further, Turkey’s political and economic capital is largely dependent on its new role as pivot between the West and the Middle East. Besides its important geographic position between the two regions, it is the only country that has considerable leverage in both regions. This is what makes Turkey such an invaluable American ally and such an important voice for Middle Eastern nations. But if Turkey continues down its recent path and establishes a strong anti-Israeli posture, many in the United States and Europe will begin to review the level of trust and recognition that Turkey earned in the past year.
Many of these strategies are tied to energy conservation, which can be achieved through decreased energy consumption, decreased conventional energy sources or using more energy efficiently.
So, part of my journey back to health includes transitioning from the regular SAD to Vegan/Raw. For the past 6mths Ive been about 60-70% Vegan/Raw and Ive been wanting to do a 30 day 100% Raw challenge. I’ve read a lot of pros and cons about the Raw diet and it seems like its pretty much up the person what works for them so I’ve finally decided to venture in and take the challenge! A huge reason why I am wanting to venture into this challenge is because, not dealing with a few years of stress has now caused extreme physical, mental and emtional issues. In the past 3 mths I have been to my family doctor and a natural path and have upcoming ‘specialist’ appointments, I have done a lot of blood work and have no answers! All that comes back is that I’m stressed, lacking in B vitamins and may have an autoimmune concern but no definitive answers! Lets just say I am VERY frustrated!!! After reading the amazing results that people have gotten, from going Raw, I am hoping this will be the case for me! Starting Monday, April 30th I will be blogging my experience.
In a story inspired by true events, Sam, a twenty-something, fast-talking salesman, is tasked with fulfilling his estranged father’s last wishes—delivering an inheritance to a sister he never knew he had. Starring Chris Pine, Elizabeth Banks, Olivia Wilde and Michelle Pfeiffer, PEOPLE LIKE US opens in theaters June 29.
Cambridge satchels tend to be regarded as being a very important watching with interest in which happens making use of the truth that each realizing moves near the deliver the results of product labels, and knowning that product labels comes a new hazy form of brains letting this passing involving imagined and sensation. Obviously, reality is judged within the detects. What could be witnessed, heard, smelled, or perhaps carressed indicates how specific a very important factor may well and also it will not often be. Combined these lines would probably are available a strong in-depth debate pertaining to aspirations in addition to the clinically insane, but in which cambridge satchel conversation must be for 1 far more morning.
Precious
These are not your standard cookie cutter fairly tale characters. Nope, they are woodcutter characters! Haha! (Excuse the pun. Once you read it you’ll understand.) Who would have thought that the author could reach so deeply into the lives of the characters in a FAIRY TALE, of all things. Fairy tales are typically stories where the characters are hollow molds used as pawns to “act out” the scenes. In the classics, there is rarely any true insight into the minds of the protagonists, nor the evil villains they encounter. Characters simply do what they do because they do it. Thankfully, this is not the case in Enchanted!
The media dont tell the truth lads - if the EDL was run by Bob Marley, had One Love as its anthem and waved the rastafari flag it would still be called 'racist' if it opposed Islamism.
But for Ilocos Norte Rep. Imelda Marcos, who, together with her late despotic husband, has historically done more harm than good to this country during their 20 years in power, not only by scandalously enriching themselves and leaving the coffers of the government dry, but also deplorably committing political repression and human rights violation – to be named second richest among the country’s politicians smacks of insult and arrogance that they have always been known for.
I spread the icing, but I think next time I would drizzle it. It has a very strong lemon flavor, and is a bit tart, which is good but too much can be over powering. The cookies are also delicious by themselves warm, right out of the oven!
On October 30 and 31, 1998 the radical Brecht Forum celebrated the 150th Anniversary of the Communist Manifesto" at Cooper Union's Great Hall, New York.
The following is not part of Mark Knoller’s original commentary.
You can download any poker software on and try it out before you decide where to start playing.
Just this afternoon my wife gave birth yet again and I was reminded of what a miracle this process is. It's always amazing to see a newborn transition so quickly to life outside the womb and adapt to a new environment.
Sculpted by Francis Bird, 1706
My quest to see if Topps left out anyone significant is rather pointless with the Cubs, because it's the Cubs! Come on! The guy with the most at-bats who didn't get a card is Dave Rosello. He hit .203 in 148 at-bats. Rob Sperring also didn't get a card. He hit .206 in 107 at-bats.
I have started decorating Aidan's grave for various holidays. My parents started doing it with Valentines day they put out the cutest display and so I have taken that and now have his St. Patrick's display out and have a bunch of things ready to go for his Easter display. It's not much, but I'm going to do things for him, he is still my son and I love him. Here are some pictures of his St. Patrick's display...
Level 3 - Complete 3 or more series.
* "Patents and jurisdiction 2: Innovia v Frito-Lay", here. Now that he has suddenly become an expert on jurisdictional matters, the IPKat explains another ruling by Mr Justice Arnold, this time in Innovia v Frito-Lay.
As mentioned before, I have a penchant for bubbling stews and soups on the stove, filling the house with enticing aromas and warmth only a well-used kitchen provides. There is one soup that I am always in the mood for, and I needed to work with what I had.
Feel free to comment and let me know if more dirty little secrets appeal to you, or if you’d rather get on to the more modern stuff!
We left to catch our 10:30 train and ended up sharing seats with a group of local kids who had also been there. Their way of staying awake on the train ride home after drinking all day? Snuff! They all had their own snuff tins and the girls were very proud that they had apricot flavored while the boys had menthol. Crazy.
swirling
The Loosh is back in school and I'm blogging again. The two things are related.
People already use their smart phones, tablets, video game consoles, and portable music devices to stay constantly connected, constantly “plugged in.” Augmented reality seems a natural extension of technology’s possibilities to a generation that has grown up with the “augmented” reality of constant connectivity. What could be wrong about enhancing our real life experience? Augmented reality offers the possibility of truly “gamifying” life by transforming our everyday realities into the game environment itself. While I wonder if “real life” is really so uninteresting and banal that we feel the need to augment it, that worry is irrelevant. The real question is: how will augmented reality change the way that people interact with one another and the world around them?
Brownsville Station – “Smokin’ in the Boys’ Room” (Big Tree)
1. Cook pasta as directed on package. Meanwhile, heat 2 tbsp. dressing in large skillet on medium heat. Add chicken, cover. Cook 5 to 6 minutes on each side or until done (165º F). Remove chicken from skillet, cover to keep warm. Carefully wipe out skillet with paper towel.
so that their hands achieve no success. He catches the wise in their craftiness,
Thirty-One is not MY business, it is my FAMILY’S business. My husband is a HOTtie (Husband of Thirty-One) and supports me 100% even when that means helping me put labels on catalogs in the middle of the night! My children of course carry Thirty-One wherever they go and my oldest especially loves to tell everyone about Thirty-One and will tell them what they need to buy! My girls help sort orders when they come in, they help stamp order forms, label catalogs, etc. It doesn’t hurt that they know that our upcoming trip to Disney is being paid for by Thirty-One Dream Rewards!
1971 I DRINK YOUR BLOOD aka PHOBIA (also writer)
Would my answer to the question
Sylvia's Fair dates for February 2012
dropped in a metro and went to the cathedral Notre Dame. while hanging around this area found really nice fast vegeterian food place. that really fitted to Eva.
“What you doing?”
1/4 cup packed brown sugar
When you feel sluggish and lack mental and physical energy, it takes a toll on your training. Training like shit is counterproductive to the goals I’m trying to accomplish right now, so having energy when I need it is key. My body is like a gas tank. I can only fill it up so much each day and as a result, the way I use that gas starts to become very important.
2 cloves garlic , minced
I poured an LA-31 for my niece – she lives in Arizona and
So my advice is to look for the smaller, lesser known venues. Often a place like Rosemary Hill that doesn’t only do functions will do fewer weddings in a week as they have other forms of sustainability. Look for the venues that are family owned and run with love rather than like a business with the end goal of monetary gain. These are the places that are likely to be willing to assist you in creating your dream wedding without the rules and restrictions of the more commercial venues. You are also likely to find that these are the venues that are a lot more affordable yet with triple the quality!
to the way station at Marjin Pass.
"Hmm," I mused. "'Bakery.'"
Well, a lot late! Oh well, better late than never!
Hollywood’s RockWalk is the only sidewalk gallery dedicated to honoring those artists who have made a significant impact and lasting contribution to the growth and evolution of Rock ‘n’ Roll, Blues and R&B. Yngwie Malmsteen’s handprints will reside alongside the handprints, signatures, and faces of other equally accomplished musicians and innovators such as Eric Clapton, Carlos Santana, Johnny Cash, Elvis Presley, Bonnie Raitt, Jerry Lee Lewis, Carl Perkins, Marvin Gaye, James Brown, Brian Wilson, Stevie Wonder, John Lee Hooker and Earth Wind & Fire among numerous others.
On arrival at Bromsgrove, the heavens opened, so me being the kind person I am, walked the 5 minutes to get the car, while T sheltered in the station…….hmmmm, something wrong there.
I have just spent some time looking over the new creatures Mike Welham is developing for Sailing the Starlit Sea. His work is consistently high quality and that is certainly the case here. While reading, I had multiple ideas on how to use these monsters in a campaign and, in some cases, how to build a whole campaign around a particular creature.
That bears a human soul!
the red stuff
The second phrase is used in conversation: "I just wanted to touch bases". I think I heard that phrase five times last week alone. Can we please retire that old cliche? While that saying may have been clever and tasty when it was first coined, its age and overuse has stolen its flavor--kind of like a baseball game hot dog. Despite the number of times I hear people use this cliche, the next time I say I want to "touch bases" with a friend, we'd better be running around a baseball diamond together.
Information: Movement of the couple around the dancefloor would of course be anticlockwise, like all other progressive dances for the ballroom. A friend points out that what she probably means here is that the "basic step," as described, produces a small clockwise movement for the couple. The lessons probably don't include any reference to an actual dancefloor or a line of dance containing other people.
The first two shades starting from the left are the most wearable. Peach parfait and Pink Truffle. Fig Jam, third from left, is quite scary when you look at it, but when you apply it, it shows up as a gorgeous bronze. The last color is Red velvet is a deep berry red. Perfect for the Winter and the holidays.
Last Wednesday, 56 year old Paul Ray Witherspoon frightened a female hospital patient while using the women and girl’s restroom at Dallas Parkland Hospital while wearing a bulky ankle tracking device used for high risk parolees. The woman notified the police, who arrived at the scene and questioned the parolee, who offered that he is a serial child sexual predator now on monitored GPS tracking for his parole.
The Michigan Immigrant Rights Center (MIRC) is a resource center for advocates seeking equal justice for Michigan’s immigrants. MIRC works to build a thriving Michigan where immigrant communities are fully integrated and respected.
She surprised me by buying me these scented green lovelies.
Des oies=Some geese
Hipness may have eluded her during punk, but with her first few
Pick up house after 4 days away.
THE BASICS: Nic Cage is a wealthy Wall Street executive. He’s also single. Because The Family Man is a) sort of a Christmas film and b) a pile of tripe, that’s not enough! He needs a wife and some kids! And by Jesus in his manger and all the elves of Santa, we are going to sit there and watch for two hours while he gets them.
